


Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - Tesco Plc - Ordinary Shares






































Morningstar Hot Topics:

Frontline


Warren Buffett


Volvo


NASDAQ Composite Index


10 Year Treasury


Commercial Banks


JPMorgan Chase


Emerging Markets


Commerce Department

































                                /
                                Free eNewsletters & Magazine




                                /
                                My Account










Quotes
Site





search






























Home


Practice Management


Research & Insights


Alternatives


ETF Managed Portfolios









Archive


Video


Products




Alternatives Screener




Strategy Screener




Advisor Profile


Behavior Gap


Fiduciary Focus


Practice Builder


Retiring With Natalie Choate


Technology




10 Questions


College Savings Educator


Fund Screen


Fund Times


Gray Matters


Investment Briefs


Investment Insights


Investments a la Carte


Market and Economy Quickview


Morningstar Conversation


Phillips Curve


Sector Rap


Spotlight


Stock Screen


Undiscovered Managers








Home>Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - Tesco Plc - Ordinary Shares















Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - Tesco Plc - Ordinary Shares
Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - Tesco Plc - Ordinary Shares

07/24/2017
  TIDMTSCO FORM 8.3 PUBLIC OPENING POSITION DISCLOSURE/DEALING DISCLOSURE BY A PERSON WITH INTERESTS IN RELEVANT SECURITIES REPRESENTING 1% OR MORE Rule 8.3 of the Takeover Code (the "Code") 1. KEY INFORMATION (a) Full name of discloser: Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. ("Dimensional"), in its capacity as investment manager and on behalf its affiliates who are also investment managers. Dimensional and its affiliates expressly disclaim beneficial ownership of the shares described in this form 8.3 (b) Owner or controller of interests and short positions disclosed, if different from 1(a): The naming of nominee or vehicle companies is insufficient. For a trust, the trustee(s), settlor and beneficiaries must be named. (c) Name of offeror/offeree in relation to whose relevant Tesco Plc securities this form relates: (GB0008847096) Use a separate form for each offeror/offeree (d) If an exempt fund manager connected with an offeror/offeree, state this and specify identity of offeror/offeree: (e) Date position held/dealing undertaken: 21 July 2017 For an opening position disclosure, state the latest practicable date prior to the disclosure (f) In addition to the company in 1(c) above, is the YES discloser making disclosures in respect of any other If YES, specify which: party to the offer? Booker Group Plc If it is a cash offer or possible cash offer, state (GB00B01TND91) "N/A" 2. POSITIONS OF THE PERSON MAKING THE DISCLOSURE If there are positions or rights to subscribe to disclose in more than one class of relevant securities of the offeror or offeree named in 1(c), copy table 2(a) or (b) (as appropriate) for each additional class of relevant security. (a) Interests and short positions in the relevant securities of the offeror or offeree to which the disclosure relates following the dealing (if any) Class of relevant security: 5p Ordinary Shares Short Interests positions Number % Number % (1) Relevant securities owned and/or controlled: 32,532,618* 0.40 (2) Cash-settled derivatives: (3) Stock-settled derivatives (including options) and agreements to purchase/sell: TOTAL: 32,532,618 0.40 *Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. and / or its affiliates do not control voting discretion for 178,951 shares. All interests and all short positions should be disclosed. Details of any open stock-settled derivative positions (including traded options), or agreements to purchase or sell relevant securities, should be given on a Supplemental Form 8 (Open Positions). (b) Rights to subscribe for new securities (including directors' and other employee options) Class of relevant security in relation to which subscription right exists: Details, including nature of the rights concerned and relevant percentages: 3. DEALINGS (IF ANY) BY THE PERSON MAKING THE DISCLOSURE Where there have been dealings in more than one class of relevant securities of the offeror or offeree named in 1(c), copy table 3(a), (b), (c) or (d) (as appropriate) for each additional class of relevant security dealt in. The currency of all prices and other monetary amounts should be stated. (a) Purchases and sales Class of relevant Purchase/sale Number of securities Price per unit security Ordinary shares Purchase 190,338 GBP 1.7573 Ordinary shares Sale 135,221 GBP 1.7578 (b) Cash-settled derivative transactions Class of Product description Nature of dealing Number of Price relevant e.g. CFD e.g. opening/closing a long/short position, increasing/reducing reference per security a long/short position securities unit (c) Stock-settled derivative transactions (including options) (i) Writing, selling, purchasing or varying Class of Product Writing, Number of Exercise Type Expiry Option relevant description purchasing, securities price e.g. American, European etc. date money security e.g. call selling, to which per paid/ option varying option unit received etc. relates per unit (ii) Exercise Class of Product description Exercising/ Number of Exercise relevant e.g. call option exercised securities price per security against unit (d) Other dealings (including subscribing for new securities) Class of Nature of dealing Details Price per unit relevant e.g. subscription, conversion (if security applicable) 4. OTHER INFORMATION (a) Indemnity and other dealing arrangements Details of any indemnity or option arrangement, or any agreement or understanding, formal or informal, relating to relevant securities which may be an inducement to deal or refrain from dealing entered into by the person making the disclosure and any party to the offer or any person acting in concert with a party to the offer: Irrevocable commitments and letters of intent should not be included. If there are no such agreements, arrangements or understandings, state "none" (b) Agreements, arrangements or understandings relating to options or derivatives Details of any agreement, arrangement or understanding, formal or informal, between the person making the disclosure and any other person relating to: (i) the voting rights of any relevant securities under any option; or (ii) the voting rights or future acquisition or disposal of any relevant securities to which any derivative is referenced: If there are no such agreements, arrangements or understandings, state "none" (c) Attachments Is a Supplemental Form 8 (Open Positions) attached? NO Date of disclosure: 24 July 2017 Contact name: Joann Kong Telephone number: 020 3033 4876 Public disclosures under Rule 8 of the Code must be made to a Regulatory Information Service and must also be emailed to the Takeover Panel at monitoring@disclosure.org.uk. The Panel's Market Surveillance Unit is available for consultation in relation to the Code's disclosure requirements on +44 (0)20 7638 0129. The Code can be viewed on the Panel's website at www.thetakeoverpanel.org.uk. This announcement is distributed by Nasdaq Corporate Solutions on behalf of Nasdaq Corporate Solutions clients. The issuer of this announcement warrants that they are solely responsible for the content, accuracy and originality of the information contained therein. Source: Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. via Globenewswire https://www.dimensional.com/   (END) Dow Jones Newswires  July 24, 2017 06:36 ET (10:36 GMT)

  Copyright (c) 2017 Dow Jones & Company, Inc.

1


ShareEmail

Print


Text Size















Our Products

Tools


Advisor Workstation


Morningstar Office


Morningstar Direct




Resources


Advisor e-Newsletters


Morningstar Magazine


Ibbotson SBBI Print Kit




Services



Back Office Services


Managed Portfolios










Contact Us
                        /
                    

Media Kit
                        /
                    

Terms of Use
                        /
                    

Privacy Policy
                        /
                    

Corrections






©2017 Morningstar Advisor. All right reserved.















Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 28, 2017 9:26 AM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. is a privately owned investment manager. The firm primarily provides its services to investment companies. It also manages accounts for public funds, Taft-Hartley Funds, corporations, non-profit organizations, pension and profit sharing plans, and financial advisors. The firm manages separate client-focused equity and fixed income portfolios. It also launches and manages equity, fixed income, and balanced mutual funds for its clients. The firm invests in the public equity and fixed income markets of the globe. It primarily invests in value stocks of small-cap and large-cap companies. The firm benchmarks the performance of its portfolios against the FTSE All-Sha...
Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. is a privately owned investment manager. The firm primarily provides its services to investment companies. It also manages accounts for public funds, Taft-Hartley Funds, corporations, non-profit organizations, pension and profit sharing plans, and financial advisors. The firm manages separate client-focused equity and fixed income portfolios. It also launches and manages equity, fixed income, and balanced mutual funds for its clients. The firm invests in the public equity and fixed income markets of the globe. It primarily invests in value stocks of small-cap and large-cap companies. The firm benchmarks the performance of its portfolios against the FTSE All-Share Index. It employs a combination of in-house and external research to make its investments. The firm operates as a subsidiary of Dimensional Fund Advisors, Inc. Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. was founded in 1990 and is based in London, United Kingdom.
Detailed Description


20 Triton StreetRegent's PlaceLondon,  NW1 3BFUnited KingdomFounded in 1990



Phone: 44 20 3033 3300

Fax: 44 20 3033 3324

www.dfauk.com







Key Executives for Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd.




Mr. Andrew Gordon Cain CFA


      	Chief Executive Officer
      








Mr. Anthony George Clifton Rossdale


      	Vice President, and Head of Finance and Compliance
      








Mr. Michael Sam Gilliland


      	Chief Operating Officer and Senior Advisor
      








Mr. Samuel Chase Adams


      	Head of European Financial Adviser Services and Vice President
      








Ms. Heather Elizabeth Matthews


      	Vice President and Portfolio Manager
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 

Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. Key Developments

Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. Presents at FundForum Asia - Asian Investment Management Conference, Apr-20-2016 09:25 AM
Apr 4 16
Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. Presents at FundForum Asia - Asian Investment Management Conference, Apr-20-2016 09:25 AM. Venue: JW Marriott Hotel, Hong Kong, Hong Kong. Speakers: Peng Chen, CEO, Asia Ex Japan.


Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. Presents at IMN 20th Annual European Beneficial Owners' Securities Lending Conference, Sep-18-2015 11:10 AM
Sep 8 15
Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. Presents at IMN 20th Annual European Beneficial Owners' Securities Lending Conference, Sep-18-2015 11:10 AM. Venue: Westminster, London, SW1P 3AA, United Kingdom. Speakers: Krati Gokharu, Associate Portfolio Manager.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @sipp plc Europe 3i plc Europe A E Taylor Financial Services Limited Europe A-List Equity Research Limited Europe A. Anthony Corporate Limited Europe




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd., please visit www.dfauk.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close





































Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - Tesco Plc - Ordinary Shares
















































July Edition Of Canna InvestorsHub Magazine Now Available


Support: 888-992-3836 | Newswire | Home | Log in












Boards


Stocks


Commodities


Forex


Cryptocurrency


The Lounge




Hot!


Breakout Boards


iHub My Stocks Activity


Ticker Buzz Cloud


Most Read


Most Posted


Most Followed Members


Recent News


Active Boards


Site Stats


New Boards


Cannabis Stocks




Tools


Data Tools >


Charts


Trader Alerts


Trades


Portfolio


Top Lists


Price & News Alerts


Commodities


Markets in 3D




NewsWire


More Tools >


Newsletters


My Image Gallery


Advanced Search


Videos


All News


Stock Screener


News Filter


Live Charts


Live News


Live Desktop


Forex Prices


Commodities


ETF Center


Educational Channel


Personal Finance Q&A






Streamer


Level 2


Follow Feed
























QuoteChartLevel 2TradesNewsFinancialsHistoricalMessage BoardTesco (PC) (USOTC)




Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - Tesco Plc - Ordinary Shares


Date : 06/28/2017 @ 5:22AM


Source : Dow Jones News


Stock : Tesco (PC) (TSCDY)


Quote :  6.945  0.0 (0.00%) @ 8:41AM


 








Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - Tesco Plc - Ordinary SharesTweet


Print


Tesco (PC) (USOTC:TSCDY)Historical Stock Chart
2 Months : From May 2017 to Jul 2017



TIDMTSCO 
 
 
   FORM 8.3 
 
   PUBLIC OPENING POSITION DISCLOSURE/DEALING DISCLOSURE BY 
 
   A PERSON WITH INTERESTS IN RELEVANT SECURITIES REPRESENTING 1% OR MORE 
 
   Rule 8.3 of the Takeover Code (the "Code") 
 
   1.         KEY INFORMATION 
 
 
 
 
(a) Full name of discloser:                                         Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. ("Dimensional"), in 
                                                                     its capacity as investment manager and on behalf its 
                                                                     affiliates who are also investment managers. Dimensional 
                                                                     and its affiliates expressly disclaim beneficial ownership 
                                                                     of the shares described in this form 8.3 
(b) Owner or controller of interests and short positions 
 disclosed, if different from 1(a): 
 The naming of nominee or vehicle companies is insufficient. 
 For a trust, the trustee(s), settlor and beneficiaries 
 must be named. 
(c) Name of offeror/offeree in relation to whose relevant           Tesco Plc 
 securities this form relates:                                       (GB0008847096) 
 Use a separate form for each offeror/offeree 
(d) If an exempt fund manager connected with an offeror/offeree, 
 state this and specify identity of offeror/offeree: 
(e) Date position held/dealing undertaken:                          27 June 2017 
 For an opening position disclosure, state the latest 
 practicable date prior to the disclosure 
(f) In addition to the company in 1(c) above, is the                YES 
 discloser making disclosures in respect of any other                If YES, specify which: 
 party to the offer?                                                 Booker Group Plc 
 If it is a cash offer or possible cash offer, state                 (GB00B01TND91) 
 "N/A" 
 
 
   2.         POSITIONS OF THE PERSON MAKING THE DISCLOSURE 
 
   If there are positions or rights to subscribe to disclose in more than 
one class of relevant securities of the offeror or offeree named in 1(c), 
copy table 2(a) or (b) (as appropriate) for each additional class of 
relevant security. 
 
   (a)        Interests and short positions in the relevant securities of 
the offeror or offeree to which the disclosure relates following the 
dealing (if any) 
 
 
 
 
Class of relevant security:                                                                             5p Ordinary Shares 
                                                                                                                        Short 
                                                                                                      Interests       positions 
                                                                                                    Number      %    Number   % 
(1) Relevant securities owned and/or controlled:                                                  32,057,319*  0.39 
(2) Cash-settled derivatives: 
(3) Stock-settled derivatives (including options) 
 and agreements to purchase/sell: 
 
                                                                                        TOTAL:     32,057,319  0.39 
 
 
   *Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. and / or its affiliates do not control 
voting discretion for 178,951 shares. 
 
   All interests and all short positions should be disclosed. 
 
   Details of any open stock-settled derivative positions (including traded 
options), or agreements to purchase or sell relevant securities, should 
be given on a Supplemental Form 8 (Open Positions). 
 
   (b)        Rights to subscribe for new securities (including directors' 
and other employee options) 
 
 
 
 
Class of relevant security in relation to which subscription 
 right exists: 
Details, including nature of the rights concerned 
 and relevant percentages: 
 
 
   3.         DEALINGS (IF ANY) BY THE PERSON MAKING THE DISCLOSURE 
 
   Where there have been dealings in more than one class of relevant 
securities of the offeror or offeree named in 1(c), copy table 3(a), (b), 
(c) or (d) (as appropriate) for each additional class of relevant 
security dealt in. 
 
   The currency of all prices and other monetary amounts should be stated. 
 
   (a)        Purchases and sales 
 
 
 
 
Class of relevant      Purchase/sale    Number of securities    Price per unit 
security 
Ordinary shares        Purchase                      132,993        GBP 1.6922 
 
 
   (b)        Cash-settled derivative transactions 
 
 
 
 
Class of    Product description                           Nature of dealing                            Number of     Price 
relevant          e.g. CFD          e.g. opening/closing a long/short position, increasing/reducing    reference      per 
security                                                 a long/short position                         securities    unit 
 
 
 
   (c)        Stock-settled derivative transactions (including options) 
 
   (i)         Writing, selling, purchasing or varying 
 
 
 
 
Class of      Product       Writing,      Number of     Exercise                Type                 Expiry     Option 
relevant    description    purchasing,    securities     price       e.g. American, European etc.     date      money 
security     e.g. call      selling,       to which       per                                                   paid/ 
              option         varying        option        unit                                                 received 
                              etc.         relates                                                               per 
                                                                                                                 unit 
 
 
 
   (ii)        Exercise 
 
 
 
 
 Class of     Product description    Exercising/     Number of      Exercise 
 relevant       e.g. call option      exercised     securities      price per 
 security                              against                        unit 
 
 
 
   (d)        Other dealings (including subscribing for new securities) 
 
 
 
 
   Class of             Nature of dealing           Details    Price per unit 
   relevant        e.g. subscription, conversion                     (if 
   security                                                      applicable) 
 
 
 
   4.         OTHER INFORMATION 
 
   (a)        Indemnity and other dealing arrangements 
 
 
 
 
Details of any indemnity or option arrangement, or 
 any agreement or understanding, formal or informal, 
 relating to relevant securities which may be an inducement 
 to deal or refrain from dealing entered into by the 
 person making the disclosure and any party to the 
 offer or any person acting in concert with a party 
 to the offer: 
 Irrevocable commitments and letters of intent should 
 not be included. If there are no such agreements, 
 arrangements or understandings, state "none" 
 
 
 
   (b)        Agreements, arrangements or understandings relating to 
options or derivatives 
 
 
 
 
Details of any agreement, arrangement or understanding, 
 formal or informal, between the person making the 
 disclosure and any other person relating to: 
 (i) the voting rights of any relevant securities under 
 any option; or 
 (ii) the voting rights or future acquisition or disposal 
 of any relevant securities to which any derivative 
 is referenced: 
 If there are no such agreements, arrangements or understandings, 
 state "none" 
 
 
 
   (c)        Attachments 
 
 
 
 
Is a Supplemental Form 8 (Open Positions) attached?    NO 
 
 
 
 
Date of disclosure:    28 June 2017 
Contact name:           Thomas Hone 
Telephone number:      020 3033 3419 
 
 
   Public disclosures under Rule 8 of the Code must be made to a Regulatory 
Information Service and must also be emailed to the Takeover Panel at 
monitoring@disclosure.org.uk.  The Panel's Market Surveillance Unit is 
available for consultation in relation to the Code's disclosure 
requirements on +44 (0)20 7638 0129. 
 
   The Code can be viewed on the Panel's website at 
www.thetakeoverpanel.org.uk. 
 
   This announcement is distributed by Nasdaq Corporate Solutions on behalf 
of Nasdaq Corporate Solutions clients. 
 
   The issuer of this announcement warrants that they are solely 
responsible for the content, accuracy and originality of the information 
contained therein. 
 
   Source: Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. via Globenewswire 
 
 
  https://www.dimensional.com/ 
 

  (END) Dow Jones Newswires

  June 28, 2017 05:07 ET (09:07 GMT)


Copyright (c) 2017 Dow Jones & Company, Inc.




 








Latest TSCDY Messages




 View More Posts
 Remove From Favorites
 Add to Favorites















{{bbMessage.M_Alias}}

{{bbMessage.MSG_Date}}
{{bbMessage.HowLongAgo}}
{{bbMessage.MSG_ID}}

{{bbMessage.MSG_Subject}}






















												Share on Facebook
											


												 Share on Twitter
											

 
												 Share on Email
											












Loading Messages....







No posts yet, be the first!
No {{symbol}} Message Board. Create One!
See More Posts on {{symbol}} Message Board

See More Message Board Posts










 

 
Your Recent History
						


 


 







LSE






					GKP
				




				Gulf Keyst..
			








LSE






					QPP
				




				Quindell
			








FTSE






					UKX
				




				FTSE 100
			








LSE






					IOF
				




				Iofina
			








FX






					GBPUSD
				




				UK Sterlin..
			



 

Stocks you've viewed will appear in this box, letting you easily return to quotes you've seen previously.Register now to create your own custom streaming stock watchlist.
  



NYSE, AMEX, and ASX quotes are delayed by at least 20 minutes.All other quotes are delayed by at least 15 minutes unless otherwise stated.		
























Careers











Careers






Apply Now


People & Culture


Working Here


Interns & Grads


Locations




Apply Now





Revolutionary Ideas. Exceptional People.

Learn More About Dimensional



Dimensional is different. We try to beat the market, not outguess it. Decades of research drive our innovative approach. 
Find out how you can join our growing team.
Explore Openings



People & Culture



Dimensional has more than 1,000 employees* around the world and is growing fast. We are committed to fostering a culture of learning, teamwork, innovation, and dedication to always doing what’s right for our clients. 
Our values attract hardworking people with strong character, and we are always looking to recruit intelligent and collaborative individuals who think critically and really care about what they do.*Number of employees as of June 20, 2016.




Watch the video to hear members of our executive team share their
thoughts on working at Dimensional.





Opportunities
Exciting roles are available in business development and marketing, investments, and corporate support for individuals with a variety of backgrounds, skills, and interests.




Mobility
We take pride in fostering internal mobility. Employees are encouraged to pursue positions inside or outside their department and in any of our global offices.




Benefits
A variety of programs help take care of you, your family, and your career, including comprehensive benefits, educational initiatives, and special celebrations of our history, culture, and growth.



Explore Openings



Working Here

We are looking for people who are talented, entrepreneurial, and excited to be a part of our growing organization. Read what some of our employees have to say about working at Dimensional.










"At Dimensional, frequent collaboration with team members across departments allows for continued evolution and innovation."
John Dashtara
Regional Director, Institutional Services










"I am amazed every day by the effort Dimensional puts forth to create an environment in which each employee feels like they are an integral part of the team and company success."
Mary Kathryn Flores
Marketing Associate










"If I were advising 
future Dimensional colleagues, I would tell them that you succeed here by knowing why it is and not what it is, 
so always ask the question why."
Ethan Wren
Portfolio Analyst, Portfolio Management










"Dimensional is often at the center of major breakthroughs in financial science, 
which provides 
an outstanding opportunity to participate in the development of new, innovative solutions 
for clients."
Wes Crill, PhD
Vice President, Research










"The most rewarding thing at Dimensional is working with people who know how to think critically and care about what they do."
Stacy Bartle
Analyst, Investment Analytics and Data, Research










"Dimensional’s transparency and discipline in our investment process 
are unparalleled in the industry, and our focus on human capital is our greatest asset."
Arun Keswani
Senior Portfolio Manager, Portfolio Management











Interns & Grads








We manage a robust campus program that targets some of the world's most prestigious schools and is designed to attract exceptional candidates for internships and entry-level openings. All positions offer an opportunity to learn about the firm, our culture, and the investment management industry—and a chance to make an immediate impact.





From Internship to Full Time
Our thriving summer internship program provides opportunities for undergraduate and graduate students to complete independent projects and work closely with firm leaders. Many summer interns go on to earn full-time positions.




New Graduates
Creative onboarding programs are designed to quickly train new hires who have recently graduated, and a unique, two-year rotational program allows newcomers to try out various positions for six-month periods.




Come Visit Us on Campus!
We are currently on campus for full-time recruitment for 2018 graduates. Summer 2018 internship recruiting begins in September for undergraduates and January for MBAs and PhDs. 
See All Events



Explore Openings



Locations

Dimensional has a global presence, with offices in the following locations:





Austin



					Austin
				












Dimensional Place6300 Bee Cave Road, Building OneAustin, TX 78746
 (512) 306-7400
http://us.dimensional.com









Charlotte



					Charlotte
				












201 North Tryon Street, Suite 2300Charlotte, NC 28202
(704) 448-8000
http://us.dimensional.com









Santa Monica



					Santa Monica
				












1299 Ocean AvenueSanta Monica, CA 90401
(310) 395-8005
http://us.dimensional.com









Vancouver



					Vancouver
				












745 Thurlow StreetSuite 2110Vancouver, BC V6E 0C5 Canada
(604) 685-1633
http://ca.dimensional.com/en/









Toronto



					Toronto
				












2 Bloor Street East, Suite 2820P.O. Box 146Toronto, ON  M4W 1A8Canada
(647) 498-9151
http://ca.dimensional.com/en/









London



					London
				












20 Triton StreetRegent's PlaceLondon NW1 3BFUnited Kingdom
+44 (0) 203 033 3300
http://eu.dimensional.com/en/









Berlin



					Berlin
				












Haus CUMBERLANDKurfürstendamm 194D-10707 BerlinGermany
+49 (30) 70015-9636
http://eu.dimensional.com/de/









Amsterdam



					Amsterdam
				












Minervalaan 641077 PE AmsterdamNetherlands
+31 (20) 708-5840
http://eu.dimensional.com/nl/









Tokyo



					Tokyo
				












3-1-1 MarunouchiKokusai BuildingSuite 808Chiyoda-ku, TokyoJapan 100-0005
(81) 03-6267-1600
http://japan.dimensional.com









Singapore



					Singapore
				












8 Marina ViewAsia Square Tower 1Suite #33-01Singapore 018960
+65 6340 1300
http://asia.dimensional.com









Sydney



					Sydney
				












Level 431 Macquarie PlaceSydney NSW 2000Australia
+61 (2) 8336-7100
http://au.dimensional.com









Melbourne



					Melbourne
				












Level 24120 Collins StreetMelbourne VIC 3000Australia
+61 (3) 8362-3990
http://au.dimensional.com







Click location to view info










Apply Today

At Dimensional, we make a point of recruiting candidates who are seeking career-defining challenges. What type of opportunity is right for you?




Campus
Are you an undergraduate or graduate
student looking for a summer
internship or your first job after
graduation? These opportunities
offer current students the chance to
make a real difference.
Explore Openings




Experienced
Are you currently employed or looking
for a new career opportunity? If you are
ready for your next challenge, these 
opportunities include a
broad array of positions designed to
satisfy many different interests.
Explore Openings









 

					© 2017 Dimensional Fund Advisors All rights reserved.
				





 



										LinkedIn
									

 



										Contact Us
									

 











Dimensional Investing | Dimensional Fund Advisors














 









 












Dimensional Investing is about implementing the great ideas in finance
for our clients.




Scroll







Dimensional* at a Glance


As of June 30, 2017                   




                                    36
                                

                                    Years since founding
                                



                                    $518B
                                

                                    In firmwide assets under management, USD (in billions)
                                



                                    12
                                

                                    Offices in eight countries
                                



                                    1,100+
                                

                                    Employees globally
                                







                                    Letter from the Chairman
                                


                                    Founder and Executive Chairman David Booth reflects on the importance of having an investment philosophy you can stick with over the long-term.
                                
Read more 


                                    Dimensional Named “Retirement Leader of the Year”
                                


                                    Dimensional Fund Advisors is honored to be named “2017 Retirement Leader of the Year” by Fund Intelligence.
                                
Learn more 


                                    Find an Advisor Near You
                                


                                    Use our “Find an Advisor” tool to connect with professionals in your area who use Dimensional funds.
                                
Learn more 


                                    Next Generation Target Date Solution
                                


                                    Dimensional’s Target Date Retirement Income Funds are designed to focus on income growth and a more complete risk management framework.
                                
Read more 










How do Dimensional’s results compare to the industry?


















Performance data shown represents past performance and is no guarantee of future results. Beginning sample includes funds as of January 1, 2002. The number of beginners is: Industry- 3,545 and Dimensional- 29. Outperformers (winners) are funds with return observations for every month of the 15-year period whose cumulative net return over the period exceeded that of their respective benchmark. US-domiciled open-end mutual fund data is from Morningstar and Center for Research in Security Prices (CRSP) from the University of Chicago.  Equity fund sample includes the Morningstar historical categories: Diversified Emerging Markets, Europe Stock, Foreign Large Blend, Foreign Large Growth, Foreign Large Value, Foreign Small/Mid Blend, Foreign Small/Mid Growth, Foreign Small/Mid Value, Japan Stock, Large Blend, Large Growth, Large Value, Mid-Cap Blend, Mid-Cap Value, Miscellaneous Region, Pacific/Asia ex-Japan Stock, Small Blend, Small Growth, Small Value, and World Stock. Fixed income fund sample includes the Morningstar historical categories: Corporate Bond, Inflation-Protected Bond, Intermediate Government, Intermediate-Term Bond, Muni California Intermediate, Muni National Intermediate, Muni National Short, Muni New York Intermediate, Muni Single State Short, Short Government, Short-Term Bond, Ultrashort Bond, and World Bond. Index funds and fund-of-funds are excluded from the sample.The return for funds with multiple share classes is taken as the asset-weighted average of the individual share class observations. Performance of each fund in the industry sample are evaluated relative to the fund’s Morningstar Category Index. Dimensional fund data provided by the fund accountant. Dimensional funds exclude VA funds and those distributed exclusively through Loring Ward.Performance of Dimensional funds measured against prospectus benchmarks. When evaluating the Dimensional funds relative to the fund’s Morningstar category index, 79% outperform. For further methodology details, see the Mutual Fund Landscape brochure.








Do you have an investment approach you can stay with during turbulent markets?


















In USD. Industry net new cash flow data provided by Investment Company Institute© based on the approximately 4,600 US-domiciled equity (domestic and international) mutual funds reported on an aggregate level to the Investment Company Institute©. This includes information on Dimensional’s US-domiciled funds during this period. Dimensional estimated net flow data provided by Morningstar based on Dimensional’s US-domiciled equity mutual funds. For illustrative purposes only. 










01
An enduring belief in the
Power of  Markets









                Capital Markets Have RewardedLong-Term Investors
            

                Growth of $1 USD, Jan. 1926–Dec. 2016
            




















          In USD. Indices are not available for direct investment. Their performance does not reflect the expenses associated with the management of an actual portfolio. US Small Cap is the CRSP 6–10 Index; US Large Cap is the S&P 500 Index. Treasury Bills is the IA SBBI US 30 Day TBill TR USD, provided by Ibbotson Associates via Morningstar Direct. Long-Term Government Bonds is the IA SBBI US LT Govt TR USD, provided by Ibbotson Associates via Morningstar Direct. US Inflation is measured as changes in the US Consumer Price Index. US Consumer Price Index data is provided by the US Department of Labor Bureau of Labor Statistics. CRSP data is provided by the Center for Research in Security Prices, University of Chicago. The S&P data is provided by Standard & Poor’s Index Services Group. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
        











At Dimensional, our investment approach is based on a belief in markets.

Rather than relying on futile forecasting or trying to outguess others, we draw information about expected returns from the market itself—letting the collective knowledge of its millions of buyers and sellers set security prices.

Letting markets do what they do best—drive information into prices—frees us to spend time where we believe we have an advantage, namely in how we interpret the research, how we design and manage portfolios, and how we service our clients. It means we take a less subjective, more systematic approach to investing—an approach we can implement consistently and investors can understand and stick with, even in challenging market environments.





                                        Read more
                                    






                            How Many Funds Outperformed Benchmarks?
                        







Only 18% of equity and fixed income funds that were around at the start of 2002 beat their Morningstar Category index, 15 years later. Over the same time period, 83% of equity and fixed income Dimensional funds outperformed their prospectus benchmarks. The figures are drawn from a selected universe of industry and Dimensional funds available in the US. Please refer to the disclosure for more details.









 
            





Performance data shown represents past performance and is no guarantee of future results. Beginning sample includes funds as of January 1, 2002. The number of beginners is: Industry- 3,545 and Dimensional- 29. Outperformers (winners) are funds with return observations for every month of the 15-year period whose cumulative net return over the period exceeded that of their respective benchmark. US-domiciled open-end mutual fund data is from Morningstar and Center for Research in Security Prices (CRSP) from the University of Chicago.  Equity fund sample includes the Morningstar historical categories: Diversified Emerging Markets, Europe Stock, Foreign Large Blend, Foreign Large Growth, Foreign Large Value, Foreign Small/Mid Blend, Foreign Small/Mid Growth, Foreign Small/Mid Value, Japan Stock, Large Blend, Large Growth, Large Value, Mid-Cap Blend, Mid-Cap Value, Miscellaneous Region, Pacific/Asia ex-Japan Stock, Small Blend, Small Growth, Small Value, and World Stock. Fixed income fund sample includes the Morningstar historical categories: Corporate Bond, Inflation-Protected Bond, Intermediate Government, Intermediate-Term Bond, Muni California Intermediate, Muni National Intermediate, Muni National Short, Muni New York Intermediate, Muni Single State Short, Short Government, Short-Term Bond, Ultrashort Bond, and World Bond. Index funds and fund-of-funds are excluded from the sample.The return for funds with multiple share classes is taken as the asset-weighted average of the individual share class observations. Performance of each fund in the industry sample are evaluated relative to the fund’s Morningstar Category Index. Dimensional fund data provided by the fund accountant. Dimensional funds exclude VA funds and those distributed exclusively through Loring Ward.Performance of Dimensional funds measured against prospectus benchmarks. When evaluating the Dimensional funds relative to the fund’s Morningstar category index, 79% outperform. For further methodology details, see the Mutual Fund Landscape brochure.



















                                        David Booth
                                    
Founder and Executive Chairman                                    
                                

                            “The number of managers that can successfully pick stocks are fewer than you’d expect by chance. So, why even play that game? You don’t need to.” 

                        




                                David Booth
                            

                            Founder and Executive Chairman
                            
                        









02
Applying insights from
 FINANCIAL SCIENCE









 Breakthroughs in Modern Finance 








1966Efficient Market Hypothesis
 






Efficient Market Hypothesis
Eugene Fama
                  Nobel laureate, 2013
                  Professor, University of Chicago

Eugene Fama’s efficient market hypothesis marks a pivotal moment for modern finance. The essence of the argument can be described by the simple statement that security prices reflect all available information.









1973Intertemporal CAPM
 


 



Intertemporal CAPM
Robert Merton
                    Nobel laureate, 1997
                    Professor, MIT

The ICAPM set up a theoretical framework for how multiple sources of risk could arise. It expanded on the one-period CAPM model where the only priced risk was market beta.









1981Small Cap Investing
 


 



Small Cap Investing
Dimensional Fund Advisors
                    David Booth, Founder
                    and Executive Chairman

Dimensional pioneers small cap investing with the launch of its first strategy, which offers investors diversified, efficient access to small company stocks.






1981 Dimensional Founded



1983Term Structure
 






Term Structure
Eugene Fama
                    Nobel laureate, 2013
                    Professor, University of Chicago

Research shows implied forward interest rates provide information on expected term premiums in fixed income.







1992Value Breakthrough
 






Value Breakthrough
Eugene Fama
                    Nobel laureate, 2013
                    Professor, University of Chicago
Kenneth French
                    Professor, Dartmouth College

Eugene Fama and Kenneth French develop the three-factor asset pricing model, which identifies market, size, and price (value) factors as the principal drivers of equity returns.









2012Profitability
 


 



Profitability
Eugene Fama
                    Nobel laureate, 2013
                    Professor, University of Chicago
Kenneth French
                    Professor, Dartmouth College
Robert Novy-Marx
                    Professor, University of Rochester

A body of academic research led to identifying profitability as a dimension of higher expected returns that can be pursued across equity markets.









Today
 


 












 Dimensional’s Research and Investment teams draw insight from academia, but what sets us apart is how we interpret, test, and apply that research to practical investment solutions for our clients. 




Tomorrow
...
 


 Dimensional was built around a set of ideas bigger than the firm itself. With a confidence in markets, deep connections to the academic community, and a focus on implementation, we go where the science leads, and continue to pursue new insights, both large and small, that can benefit our clients. 

















 Eugene Fama and Kenneth French are members of the Board of Directors for and provide consulting services to Dimensional Fund Advisors LP. Robert Merton and Robert Novy-Marx provide consulting services to Dimensional Fund Advisors LP. 


 








Dimensional’s investment approach is grounded in economic theory and backed by decades of empirical research.


Our internal team of researchers works closely with leading financial economists to better understand where returns come from.


Research has shown that securities that offer higher expected returns share certain characteristics, which we call dimensions. To be considered a dimension, these characteristics must be sensible, persistent over time, pervasive across markets, and cost-effective to capture.





                                        Read More 
                                    






                                The Evolution of Indexing and Dimensional
                            


















                                        Eugene Fama
                                    
Nobel laureate, 2013 Professor, University of Chicago; Director and Consultant, Dimensional                                    
                                

                            “We’re very careful in looking at new research that comes along and making sure it’s robust.” 

                        




                                Eugene Fama
                            

                            Nobel laureate, 2013 Professor, University of Chicago; Director and Consultant, Dimensional
                            
                        












Understanding what drives returns is the starting point. From here, we focus on fine-tuning our method of capturing them.


We structure broadly diversified portfolios that emphasize the dimensions of higher expected returns, while addressing the tradeoffs that arise when executing portfolios.


Every day our portfolio managers and traders seek to balance costs against expected returns and diversification. We work for the slightest expected gain, as every incremental improvement can add up over time.





                                        Read More
                                    






                            The Gap Between Realityand a Model
                        







Limitations
of the Model


False
Positives

Insights



MODEL
REALITY









                 Academic models provide useful insight, but they are incomplete. It’s in the gap between reality and a model where sound judgment and experience matter.
            





                                        Watch
                                        
                                            Dimensional Stories: Models
                                            (03:07)
                                        














                                        Eduardo Repetto
                                    
Co-Chief Executive Officer; Co-Chief Investment Officer                                    
                                

                            “The money we manage is not our money—it’s our clients’ past and their future. We take that responsibility very seriously.”

                        




                                Eduardo Repetto
                            

                            Co-Chief Executive Officer; Co-Chief Investment Officer
                            
                        







 


03

A commitment 
TO OUR CLIENTS









                The Global Financial Crisis and Its Aftermath 
            

                A key to a good long-term investment experience is being able to stay with your investment philosophy, even during tough times. During the rocky 2008–2012 period, many investors sold their equity funds. Dimensional’s equity funds had inflows throughout the period, which could suggest that in aggregate investors were prepared to withstand the market’s movements in order to pursue long-term results.
            




















        In USD. Dimensional estimated net flow data provided by Morningstar based on Dimensional’s US-domiciled equity mutual funds. Industry net new cash flow data provided by Investment Company Institute© based on the approximately 4,600 US-domiciled equity (domestic and international) mutual funds reported on an aggregate level to the Investment Company Institute©. This includes information on Dimensional’s US-domiciled funds during this period. For illustrative purposes only.
        












Dimensional Investing is about providing a successful investment experience.


That means more than considering investment returns. It means offering peace of mind knowing that a transparent approach backed by decades of research is powering every decision.


Markets go up and they go down. The goal of Dimensional Investing is to help people be prepared, so they can stick with their plan.





                                        Read more
                                    






Institutional Investor’s2016 Money Masters
                            


















                                        DAVE BUTLER 
                                    
Co-Chief Executive Officer and Head of Global Financial Advisor Services                                    
                                

                            “The client experience has always been, and will continue to be, why we do what we do.” 

                        




                                DAVE BUTLER 
                            

                            Co-Chief Executive Officer and Head of Global Financial Advisor Services
                            
                        










*“Dimensional” refers to the Dimensional separate but affiliated entities generally, rather than to one particular entity. These entities are Dimensional Fund Advisors LP, Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd., DFA Australia Limited, Dimensional Fund Advisors Canada ULC, Dimensional Fund Advisors Pte. Ltd., and Dimensional Japan Ltd.








Dimensional Fund Advisors LP is an investment advisor registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Consider the investment objectives, risks, and charges and expenses of the Dimensional funds carefully before investing. For this and other information about the Dimensional funds, please read the prospectus carefully before investing. Prospectuses are available by calling Dimensional Fund Advisors collect at (512) 306-7400 or at us.dimensional.com. Dimensional funds are distributed by DFA Securities LLC. None of the other Dimensional entities are currently licensed by, registered with, or supervised by the Securities and Exchange Commission. Nothing on this website shall constitute or serve as an offer to sell products or services in any country or jurisdiction by any Dimensional global firm. For informational purposes only. All information is given in good faith and without warranty and should not be considered investment advice or an offer of any security for sale.








Eugene Fama is a member of the Board of Directors for and provides consulting services to Dimensional Fund Advisors LP.








Research Dimensional Fund Advisors and DFA Securities with FINRA's BrokerCheck.








Profitability is a measure of current profitability, based on information from individual companies’ income statements. 




















About Us | Dimensional














 









 









                    About Us
                


Dimensional is a global investment manager dedicated to implementing the great ideas in finance.


Founded in 1981, we have a long history of applying academic research to practical investing. Today, we offer a full range of equity and fixed income strategies designed to target higher expected returns. We regard the assets we manage as more than just shares in a portfolio. The money represents the savings, sacrifice, and dreams that investors have entrusted to us. We take this responsibility seriously.




        ﻿
        











                                Dimensional Origins
                            

                                (4:21)
                            

                            For more than 35 years, Dimensional has been putting financial science to work for investors by translating compelling research into real-world investment solutions.
                        
































                                        Kenneth French
                                    
Professor, Dartmouth College; Director and Consultant, Dimensional                                    
                                

                            “People at Dimensional care much more about getting the right answer than defending their answer.”

                        




                                Kenneth French
                            

                            Professor, Dartmouth College; Director and Consultant, Dimensional
                            
                        







﻿


        




                            We are passionate about what we do, and through our close relationships with institutional investors, consultants, and financial advisors globally, we’ve seen the difference our approach has made in people’s lives over the past 35 years. Hear from our employees.

























                Our Leadership
            
Since the firm was founded in 1981, Dimensional’s leadership has remained committed to fostering a culture of learning, teamwork, innovation, and dedication to always doing what’s right for our clients. 








                                            Global Leadership
                                        



                                            Board Of Directors
                                        




                                    Global Leadership
                                

                                    “Global Leadership” refers to Dimensional Fund Advisors LP (US).
                                






                                                        David Booth
                                                    
Founder and Executive Chairman
                                                










                                                            David Booth
                                                        

Founder and Executive Chairman
                                                        



                                                            “At the end of it all, it’s about implementation of the great ideas—and these ideas are much bigger than the firm.”
                                                        


David Booth, a founder of Dimensional Fund Advisors in 1981, is the firm’s Executive Chairman. 

Currently, David serves on the Investment Company Institute’s Board of Governors and is an active member of ICI’s Executive Committee. In 2016, he received the Investment Management Lifetime Achievement Award from Institutional Investor magazine, and Forbes ranked David as No. 39 on the magazine’s list of the 40 “Money Masters: The Most Powerful People in the Financial World.” In 2012, he was awarded the Outstanding Financial Executive Award by the Financial Management Association International for his background and accomplishments in applying financial theory and research to the practical world of asset management, particularly for his pioneering work in indexing and small capitalization investing. MutualFundWire ranks him seventh in its list of the 100 Most Influential People in mutual funds, and in 2010, InvestmentNews named David as one of “The Power 20” in the financial services industry. 

David has written numerous articles, including “Diversification Returns and Asset Management” with Eugene F. Fama, which won a Graham and Dodd Award of Excellence from the Financial Analysts Journal in 1992. 

The University of Chicago Booth School of Business was named in honor of David, where he also serves as a lifetime member of the school’s business advisory council. David is a member of the board of trustees of the University of Chicago, the University of Kansas Endowment Association, and Museum of Modern Art in New York. He is also on the board of overseers for the Becker Friedman Institute. 

David received his MBA from the University of Chicago in 1971. He also holds an MS and a BA from the University of Kansas.









                                                        Eduardo Repetto
                                                    
Co-Chief Executive Officer, Co-Chief Investment Officer, and Director
                                                










                                                            Eduardo Repetto
                                                        

Co-Chief Executive Officer, Co-Chief Investment Officer, and Director
                                                        






Eduardo Repetto serves as Co-Chief Executive Officer, Co-Chief Investment Officer, and a Director of Dimensional Fund Advisors LP. He provides oversight across the investment, client service, marketing, and operational functions of the firm. He is also a Director and Officer of many of the subsidiaries of Dimensional Fund Advisors LP, which have offices around the world. Eduardo is a member of the Investment Committee and Investment Research Committee of Dimensional. He joined the firm in 2000. He has been a Director of the Dimensional US Mutual Funds since 2009, when he was elected by the shareholders of the funds. 

Eduardo obtained his PhD in aeronautics from the California Institute of Technology in 1998, where he received the William F. Ballhaus Prize for outstanding doctoral dissertation in aeronautics and the Ernest E. Sechler Memorial Award for his teaching and research efforts. Eduardo earned an MSc in engineering from Brown University and a diploma de honor in civil engineering from the Universidad de Buenos Aires. 









                                                        Dave Butler
                                                    
Co-Chief Executive Officer, Head of Global Financial Advisor Services, and Director
                                                










                                                            Dave Butler
                                                        

Co-Chief Executive Officer, Head of Global Financial Advisor Services, and Director
                                                        



                                                            “We’re helping advisors deliver the best possible client experience, and that’s been our model since day one.”
                                                        


Dave Butler serves as Co-Chief Executive Officer, Head of Global Financial Advisor Services, and a Director of Dimensional Fund Advisors LP. He joined Dimensional in 1995 and brings more than 20 years of experience working with financial advisors. He leads a worldwide team of regional directors and client services professionals who apply Dimensional’s strategies and resources to help advisors provide investors with an outstanding client experience. Dave is on the firm’s Executive Committee and has been involved with firmwide strategic vision and decision making for many years. 


Dave attended the University of California, Berkeley, earning his BS in marketing and finance in 1986 and an MBA in 1990. He received the CFA designation in 1998. Dave played basketball for Cal and was drafted by the Boston Celtics. In 2011, he was inducted into the Cal Athletics Hall of Fame, and in 2014, he was named to the Pac-12 Basketball Hall of Honor. Dave was also a Rhodes Scholar candidate.









                                                        Gerard K. O’Reilly
                                                    
Co-Chief Investment Officer and Head of Research
                                                










                                                            Gerard K. O’Reilly
                                                        

Co-Chief Investment Officer and Head of Research
                                                        



                                                            “The nuance and expertise is where you take knowledge and information and implement it in a real test, not in the backtest.”
                                                        


Gerard O’Reilly serves as Co-Chief Investment Officer and Head of Research at Dimensional Fund Advisors. He oversees the design, development, and research that inform Dimensional’s investment approach, as well as its application through portfolio management and trading. As Head of Research, he leads a team that works closely with the academic community, conducts its own thorough testing of the research, and identifies relevant applications for Dimensional’s investment solutions.

Gerard is also co-chair of the Investment Research Committee and a member of the Investment Committee. The Investment Committee sets policy and oversees management of the firm’s portfolios and accounts.

Prior to joining Dimensional in 2004, Gerard received his PhD in aeronautics from the California Institute of Technology. He also holds an MSc in high-performance computing and a BA in theoretical physics from the mathematics department of Trinity College Dublin, where he was a recipient of the college’s Foundation Scholarship.









                                                        Stephen Clark
                                                    
Head of Global Institutional Services and President, Dimensional International
                                                










                                                            Stephen Clark
                                                        

Head of Global Institutional Services and President, Dimensional International
                                                        



                                                            “Once you understand the way we invest money at Dimensional, it’s very hard to go do it somewhere else. If you truly believe in what we do, there’s just no other place like this.”
                                                        


Stephen A. Clark oversees Dimensional’s global Institutional group. The group services corporate, subadvisory, endowment, foundation, university, and public clients as well as the consulting community. Steve is deeply involved in the design and marketing of new products and strategies, and works closely with the Investment team. Prior to his current position in the Institutional group, Steve oversaw Dimensional’s global Portfolio Management department.

Steve joined Dimensional in 2001 as a general portfolio manager in US equities and became co-head of the international Portfolio Management and Trading group in 2004. His financial career began at John Nuveen & Company in 1997, where he was instrumental in structuring mergers and acquisitions for the company’s healthcare services division. He holds an MBA from the University of Chicago Booth School of Business and a BS from Bradley University.









                                                        Sam Gilliland
                                                    
Senior Adviser and Chief Operating Officer 
                                                










                                                            Sam Gilliland
                                                        

Senior Adviser and Chief Operating Officer 
                                                        






As Senior Adviser, Sam Gilliland works across the entire firm to enhance practices and disciplines necessary to achieve the growth Dimensional anticipates in the coming years. As Chief Operating Officer, Sam is also responsible for the Finance and Accounting, Human Resources, and Technology teams.

Prior to joining Dimensional, Sam was an executive partner with a private equity firm while also serving on the boards of several public and private companies. In addition, for nearly 10 years he was chairman and chief executive officer of Sabre, a technology firm focused on the travel sector, where he managed more than 10,000 employees in 60 countries. Sam holds an MBA from the University of Texas at Dallas and a bachelor’s degree in electrical engineering from the University of Kansas.









                                                        Catherine L. Newell
                                                    
General Counsel
                                                










                                                            Catherine L. Newell
                                                        

General Counsel
                                                        






Catherine Newell serves as General Counsel for Dimensional, supervising the legal work of Dimensional and its subsidiaries and funds. In this role, she oversees the preparation of new product and corporate governance materials, business contracts, and other legal and regulatory matters, and heads up the firm’s Global Legal team. In addition, Catherine serves on Dimensional’s seven-person Executive Committee in the role of Chief of Staff. Prior to joining Dimensional in 1996, she was an associate in the law firm of Morrison & Foerster LLP, practicing in the areas of corporate finance and investment management law. 

Catherine earned a JD from the University of California, Los Angeles, School of Law in 1989, where she served on the UCLA Law Review, and a bachelor of arts in government from the University of Notre Dame in 1986.









                                                        Christopher Crossan
                                                    
Global Chief Compliance Officer
                                                










                                                            Christopher Crossan
                                                        

Global Chief Compliance Officer
                                                        






Christopher Crossan is vice president and Global Chief Compliance Officer for Dimensional Fund Advisors, managing all compliance matters for the firm, its subsidiaries, and the Dimensional Funds.

Previously, Chris was senior compliance officer for INVESCO Institutional. Before that, he filled a variety of roles at the US Securities and Exchange Commission, inspecting more than 100 investment firms. His last role at the SEC was as branch chief, overseeing their mutual fund and advisor inspection programs in the Southeastern US. Chris is a CPA and holds a BS in accountancy from Arizona State University.






                                    Global Affiliates
                                

                                    These entities are Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd., DFA Australia Limited, Dimensional Fund Advisors Canada ULC, Dimensional Fund Advisors Pte. Ltd., and Dimensional Japan Ltd.
                                






                                                        Art Barlow
                                                    
Managing Director and Senior Portfolio Manager, Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. (UK)
                                                










                                                            Art Barlow
                                                        

Managing Director and Senior Portfolio Manager, Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. (UK)
                                                        






Arthur H.F. Barlow serves as Managing Director of Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd., overseeing Dimensional’s EMEA business.

In his 26-year career at Dimensional, Art has been involved in all aspects of the firm’s business. When he joined Dimensional in 1990, he was one of six portfolio managers and one of only 40 firm employees. In February 1992, he was chosen by Dimensional founder David Booth to solidify Dimensional’s European presence through the opening of the firm’s London office. Art established and grew the office, overseeing all local activities. He then became head of Dimensional’s International Desk and subsequently became head of Technology, spearheading a project to implement a new portfolio management and trading database and establishing Dimensional’s online presence. Art is an experienced leader and investment professional who has extensive contact with clients and consultants and represents Dimensional at conferences and industry events.

Art received his MBA in finance from the Anderson School of Management at the University of California, Los Angeles, and holds a BA in economics from UCLA.









                                                        Glenn Crane
                                                    
Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, DFA Australia Limited (Australia)
                                                










                                                            Glenn Crane
                                                        

Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, DFA Australia Limited (Australia)
                                                        






J. Glenn Crane is a founding director of DFA Australia Limited and was responsible for establishing the business in 1994. He is Chairman of the board of directors and the Compliance Committee.

Glenn has extensive experience in all aspects of the financial services sector. In addition to his role at Dimensional, he is the chairman of Ceanet Pty Limited and NAQ Technology Limited, and is a fellow of the Australian Institute of Company Directors. Glenn received his BComm and LLB from the University of New South Wales and practiced law for five years before moving into the commercial environment.









                                                        Peng Chen
                                                    
Chief Executive Officer, Dimensional Fund Advisors Pte. Ltd. (Asia ex Japan)
                                                










                                                            Peng Chen
                                                        

Chief Executive Officer, Dimensional Fund Advisors Pte. Ltd. (Asia ex Japan)
                                                        






Peng Chen joined Dimensional in 2012 as Chief Executive Officer of Asia ex Japan. He is a member of Dimensional’s Investment Research Committee and chairs the global Defined Contribution Business Committee. In addition, he serves as Adjunct Professor in Finance at the Chinese University of Hong Kong.

Prior to joining Dimensional, Peng served as president of Morningstar’s global investment management division, which consists of Morningstar’s investment consulting, retirement advice, and investment management operations in North America, Europe, Asia, and Australia, with approximately $190 billion in assets under advisement or management. Before that, he was president and chief investment officer at Ibbotson Associates. Peng is an editorial board member of the Financial Analysts Journal and a contributing editor for the Asian Financial Planning Journal. He was selected to the Chicago Crain’s Business “40 under 40s” in 2007. He was also named to the Investment Advisor list of the “25 Most Influential Individuals” in 2008 and won the Financial Analysts Journal’s prestigious Graham and Dodd Scroll Award three times, in 2011, 2007, and 2003. He also won the Retirement Income Industry Association’s 2012 Academic Thought Leadership Award.

Peng holds a PhD and MS in consumer economics from Ohio State University. Before coming to the US to pursue his graduate studies, Peng grew up in Harbin, China, and holds a BS in industrial engineering from the Harbin Institute of Technology in China.









                                                        John R. Alkire
                                                    
Chief Executive Officer, Dimensional Japan Ltd. (Japan)
                                                










                                                            John R. Alkire
                                                        

Chief Executive Officer, Dimensional Japan Ltd. (Japan)
                                                        






John Alkire is Chief Executive Officer of Dimensional Japan Ltd. and serves as the head of Dimensional’s Japan operations. John was appointed CEO of Dimensional Japan in November 2012 and began his tenure in January 2013. Prior to his appointment, John was a consultant to Dimensional, assisting the firm in its expansion in Asia.

John has more than 35 years of securities investment experience. Previously, he served as president and chief investment officer of Morgan Stanley Asset & Investment Trust Management Co., Ltd. (MSAITM) in Tokyo, where he oversaw approximately $45 billion in institutional assets. John joined Morgan Stanley in 1981 as head of institutional equity for Asia in New York and established MSAITM, later renamed Morgan Stanley Investment Management (Japan), in Japan in 1995. In 1996, MSAITM was selected by Japan’s Government Pension Investment Fund (then called Nempuku) as one of the first three investment managers to manage its assets.

John’s relationship with Dimensional began in the late 1980s. He first worked with Dimensional founder David Booth in 1985, and while at Morgan Stanley, he helped launch a Japanese small company strategy for Dimensional in 1986.

John was the first non-Japanese vice chairman of the Japanese Securities Investment Advisors Association, from 1998 to 2000. He was born and raised in Japan, speaks fluent Japanese, and graduated from the University of Victoria, British Columbia.








                                    Board of Directors, Dimensional Fund Advisors, US
                                

                                    “Board of Directors” refers to Dimensional Fund Advisors LP (US).
                                






                                                        David Booth
                                                    
Chairman
                                                










                                                            David Booth
                                                        

Chairman
                                                        



                                                            “At the end of it all, it’s about implementation of the great ideas—and these ideas are much bigger than the firm.”
                                                        


David Booth, a founder of Dimensional Fund Advisors in 1981, is the firm’s Executive Chairman. 

Currently, David serves on the Investment Company Institute’s Board of Governors and is an active member of ICI’s Executive Committee. In 2016, he received the Investment Management Lifetime Achievement Award from Institutional Investor magazine, and Forbes ranked David as No. 39 on the magazine’s list of the 40 “Money Masters: The Most Powerful People in the Financial World.” In 2012, he was awarded the Outstanding Financial Executive Award by the Financial Management Association International for his background and accomplishments in applying financial theory and research to the practical world of asset management, particularly for his pioneering work in indexing and small capitalization investing. MutualFundWire ranks him seventh in its list of the 100 Most Influential People in mutual funds, and in 2010, InvestmentNews named David as one of “The Power 20” in the financial services industry. 

David has written numerous articles, including “Diversification Returns and Asset Management” with Eugene F. Fama, which won a Graham and Dodd Award of Excellence from the Financial Analysts Journal in 1992. 

The University of Chicago Booth School of Business was named in honor of David, where he also serves as a lifetime member of the school’s business advisory council. David is a member of the board of trustees of the University of Chicago, the University of Kansas Endowment Association, and Museum of Modern Art in New York. He is also on the board of overseers for the Becker Friedman Institute. 

David received his MBA from the University of Chicago in 1971. He also holds an MS and a BA from the University of Kansas.









                                                        Eugene Fama
                                                    
Nobel laureate, Director, and Consultant
                                                










                                                            Eugene Fama
                                                        

Nobel laureate, Director, and Consultant
                                                        



                                                            “In poring over statistical work, we try to document whether it’s really systematic or just a chance result. It’s like an ongoing crime scene, where you’re always learning stuff.”
                                                        


Eugene F. Fama, 2013 Nobel laureate in Economic Sciences, is the principal scholar whose groundbreaking work inspired the founding of Dimensional. Widely recognized as the "father of modern finance," Professor Fama developed the efficient market hypothesis. He serves on Dimensional's board of directors and Investment Research Committee. In this capacity, Professor Fama advises the firm on many of its strategies and is also a frequent speaker at Dimensional conferences and seminars. Professor Fama has written two books and published more than 100 articles in academic journals. His paper "The Cross-Section of Expected Stock Returns," coauthored with Kenneth R. French, won the 1992 Smith Breeden Prize for the best paper in the Journal of Finance. And his paper "Market Efficiency, Long-Term Returns, and Behavioral Finance" won the 1998 Fama-DFA Prize for the best paper published in the Journal of Financial Economics in the areas of capital markets and asset pricing.

Professor Fama received the Fred Arditti Innovation Award from the CME Center for Innovation in 2007. He was also the first recipient of three major prizes for research in finance: the Deutsche Bank Prize in Financial Economics in 2005, the Morgan Stanley American Finance Association Award for Excellence in Finance in 2007, and the Onassis Prize in Finance in 2009. His other awards include the 1982 Chaire Francqui (Belgian National Science Prize) and the 2006 Nicholas Molodovsky Award from the CFA Institute.

Professor Fama was the first elected fellow of the American Finance Association in 2001 and is a fellow of the Econometric Society and the American Academy of Arts and Sciences. He is also an advisory editor of the Journal of Financial Economics and chairman of the Center for Research in Security Prices at the University of Chicago Booth School of Business.

Professor Fama earned a bachelor's degree from Tufts University and an MBA and PhD from the University of Chicago Booth School of Business in 1964. He joined the Chicago Booth faculty in 1963. He has been awarded a doctor of law degree from the University of Rochester; a doctor of law degree from DePaul University; a doctor honoris causa from the Catholic University of Leuven, Belgium; and a doctor of science honoris causa from Tufts.










                                                        Kenneth French
                                                    
Director, Consultant, and Co-Chair of the Investment Research Committee
                                                










                                                            Kenneth French
                                                        

Director, Consultant, and Co-Chair of the Investment Research Committee
                                                        



                                                            “It’s just fun to do research, learn new stuff, and potentially have an impact on the way other people are thinking about the world.”
                                                        


Kenneth R. French is the Roth Family Distinguished Professor of Finance at the Tuck School of Business at Dartmouth College. He is an expert on the behavior of security prices and investment strategies. He and coauthor Eugene F. Fama are well known for their research into the value effect and the three-factor model, including articles such as "The Cross-Section of Expected Stock Returns" and "Common Risk Factors in the Returns on Stocks and Bonds." His recent research focuses on tests of asset pricing, the tradeoff between risk and return in domestic and international financial markets, and the relation between capital structure and firm value.

Professor French is a consultant to Dimensional Fund Advisors, a member of the firm's board of directors, and co-chair of Dimensional's Investment Research Committee. He is also a regular speaker at Dimensional conferences and seminars.

French is a Fellow of the American Academy of Arts and Sciences, the American Finance Association, and the Financial Management Association. He is also a research associate at the National Bureau of Economic Research; an advisory editor of the Journal of Financial Economics, the Journal of Banking and Finance, and the Financial Review; a former associate editor of the Journal of Finance and the Review of Financial Studies; and a former president of the American Finance Association. French is a member of the International Rescue Committee's Board of Overseers and chairman of the Valpo Surf Project's Board of Directors.

Before joining Dartmouth, Professor French was on the faculty of MIT's Sloan School of Management, the Yale School of Management, and the University of Chicago's Booth School of Business. Professor French received his PhD in finance from the University of Rochester in 1983. He also earned an MS and an MBA from the University of Rochester and a BS from Lehigh University. In addition to teaching, doing research, and working on investment issues, he enjoys bicycling, snowshoeing, and hiking.










                                                        John A. McQuown
                                                    
Director
                                                










                                                            John A. McQuown
                                                        

Director
                                                        



                                                            “Modern finance is based primarily on scientific reasoning guided by theory, not subjectivity and speculation.”
                                                        


John A. "Mac" McQuown worked with Dimensional cofounder David G. Booth to develop the first institutional index funds at Wells Fargo in the early 1970s, and was the first chairman of the Wells Fargo Investment Advisors (now Barclays Global Investors). He maintains close ties to investment strategies as a cofounding member of Dimensional Fund Advisors' board of directors.

As an independent consultant, McQuown worked with large multinational financial institutions in the development and implementation of investment strategies in markets around the globe. In addition to serving on Dimensional's board of directors, he is cofounder and director of Diversified Credit Investments LLC, which builds diversified corporate debt portfolios with proprietary quantitative methods. McQuown owns and oversees Stone Edge Vineyard and Stone Edge Farm Winery in Sonoma, California.










                                                        Eduardo Repetto
                                                    
Director
                                                










                                                            Eduardo Repetto
                                                        

Director
                                                        






Eduardo Repetto serves as Co-Chief Executive Officer, Co-Chief Investment Officer, and a Director of Dimensional Fund Advisors LP. He provides oversight across the investment, client service, marketing, and operational functions of the firm. He is also a Director and Officer of many of the subsidiaries of Dimensional Fund Advisors LP, which have offices around the world. Eduardo is a member of the Investment Committee and Investment Research Committee of Dimensional. He joined the firm in 2000. He has been a Director of the Dimensional US Mutual Funds since 2009, when he was elected by the shareholders of the funds. 

Eduardo obtained his PhD in aeronautics from the California Institute of Technology in 1998, where he received the William F. Ballhaus Prize for outstanding doctoral dissertation in aeronautics and the Ernest E. Sechler Memorial Award for his teaching and research efforts. Eduardo earned an MSc in engineering from Brown University and a diploma de honor in civil engineering from the Universidad de Buenos Aires. 









                                                        Dave Butler
                                                    
Director
                                                










                                                            Dave Butler
                                                        

Director
                                                        



                                                            “We’re helping advisors deliver the best possible client experience, and that’s been our model since day one.”
                                                        


Dave Butler serves as Co-Chief Executive Officer, Head of Global Financial Advisor Services, and a Director of Dimensional Fund Advisors LP. He joined Dimensional in 1995 and brings more than 20 years of experience working with financial advisors. He leads a worldwide team of regional directors and client services professionals who apply Dimensional’s strategies and resources to help advisors provide investors with an outstanding client experience. Dave is on the firm’s Executive Committee and has been involved with firmwide strategic vision and decision making for many years. 


Dave attended the University of California, Berkeley, earning his BS in marketing and finance in 1986 and an MBA in 1990. He received the CFA designation in 1998. Dave played basketball for Cal and was drafted by the Boston Celtics. In 2011, he was inducted into the Cal Athletics Hall of Fame, and in 2014, he was named to the Pac-12 Basketball Hall of Honor. Dave was also a Rhodes Scholar candidate.






                                    Board of Directors, Dimensional Mutual Funds, US
                                








                                                        David Booth
                                                    
Chairman
                                                










                                                            David Booth
                                                        

Chairman
                                                        



                                                            “At the end of it all, it’s about implementation of the great ideas—and these ideas are much bigger than the firm.”
                                                        


David Booth, a founder of Dimensional Fund Advisors in 1981, is the firm’s Executive Chairman. 

Currently, David serves on the Investment Company Institute’s Board of Governors and is an active member of ICI’s Executive Committee. In 2016, he received the Investment Management Lifetime Achievement Award from Institutional Investor magazine, and Forbes ranked David as No. 39 on the magazine’s list of the 40 “Money Masters: The Most Powerful People in the Financial World.” In 2012, he was awarded the Outstanding Financial Executive Award by the Financial Management Association International for his background and accomplishments in applying financial theory and research to the practical world of asset management, particularly for his pioneering work in indexing and small capitalization investing. MutualFundWire ranks him seventh in its list of the 100 Most Influential People in mutual funds, and in 2010, InvestmentNews named David as one of “The Power 20” in the financial services industry. 

David has written numerous articles, including “Diversification Returns and Asset Management” with Eugene F. Fama, which won a Graham and Dodd Award of Excellence from the Financial Analysts Journal in 1992. 

The University of Chicago Booth School of Business was named in honor of David, where he also serves as a lifetime member of the school’s business advisory council. David is a member of the board of trustees of the University of Chicago, the University of Kansas Endowment Association, and Museum of Modern Art in New York. He is also on the board of overseers for the Becker Friedman Institute. 

David received his MBA from the University of Chicago in 1971. He also holds an MS and a BA from the University of Kansas.









                                                        George M. Constantinides
                                                    
Independent Director and Leo Melamed Professor of Finance, University of Chicago
                                                










                                                            George M. Constantinides
                                                        

Independent Director and Leo Melamed Professor of Finance, University of Chicago
                                                        






An independent director of Dimensional's US mutual fund board, George M. Constantinides is the Leo Melamed Professor of Finance at the Chicago Booth School of Business. He is a leader in portfolio management, asset pricing, derivatives pricing, and capital markets behavior. Widely published and a frequent speaker and editor, Professor Constantinides is a Fellow of the American Finance Association and former president of the American Finance Association and of the Society for Financial Studies, among many other professional affiliations. A graduate of Oxford University in England and Indiana University, he has been a Marvin Bower Fellow at Harvard University and taught at Carnegie Mellon University.









                                                        Douglas W. Diamond
                                                    
Independent Director and Merton H. Miller Distinguished Service Professor of Finance, University of Chicago
                                                










                                                            Douglas W. Diamond
                                                        

Independent Director and Merton H. Miller Distinguished Service Professor of Finance, University of Chicago
                                                        






Douglas W. Diamond specializes in the study of financial intermediaries, financial crises, and liquidity. He is the Merton H. Miller Distinguished Service Professor of Finance at the University of Chicago’s Booth School of Business. He has been on the faculty since 1979. Diamond is a research associate of the National Bureau of Economic Research and a visiting scholar at the Federal Reserve Bank of Richmond. He was president of the American Finance Association and the Western Finance Association and is a fellow of the National Academy of Sciences, the Econometric Society, the American Academy of Arts and Sciences, and the American Finance Association. Diamond received the CME Group- Mathematical Sciences Research Institute Prize in Innovative Quantitative Applications in 2016 and the Morgan Stanley-American Finance Association Award for Excellence in Finance in 2012.


He has taught at Yale and was a visiting professor at the MIT Sloan School of Management, the Hong Kong University of Science and Technology as well as the University of Bonn. Diamond earned a bachelor's degree in economics from Brown University in 1975. He earned master's degrees in 1976 and 1977 and a PhD in 1980 in economics from Yale University.










                                                        John P. Gould
                                                    
Independent Director and Steven G. Rothmeier Distinguished Service Professor of Economics, University of Chicago
                                                










                                                            John P. Gould
                                                        

Independent Director and Steven G. Rothmeier Distinguished Service Professor of Economics, University of Chicago
                                                        






John P. Gould serves as an independent director of Dimensional's US mutual fund board and is a specialist in the economics of information, microeconomic theory, industrial organization, strategy, law, and economics. A member of the faculty of the University of Chicago Booth School of Business since 1965, Professor Gould was dean of the school from 1983–1993 and is now the Steven G. Rothmeier Professor and Distinguished Service Professor of Economics. A busy editor, trustee, and director, he holds a BS with highest distinction from Northwestern University and an MBA and PhD from the University of Chicago.









                                                        Roger G. Ibbotson
                                                    
Independent Director and Professor in the Practice of Finance, Yale University
                                                










                                                            Roger G. Ibbotson
                                                        

Independent Director and Professor in the Practice of Finance, Yale University
                                                        






Roger G. Ibbotson is the chairman and CIO of Zebra Capital Management, LLC, a global equity asset and hedge fund manager. He is also advisor and founder of Ibbotson Associates, now a Morningstar, Inc., company. His book with Rex A. Sinquefield, Stocks, Bonds, Bills, and Inflation, updated annually, serves as the standard reference for information on investment market returns. He is a regular contributor and editorial board member to both trade and academic journals, and is the recipient of many awards including Graham and Dodd Awards of Excellence in 1979, 1982, 1984, 2001, 2004, and 2007.

A professor of finance at Yale School of Management, Professor Ibbotson received a PhD from the University of Chicago, an MBA from Indiana University, and a BS from Purdue University.










                                                        Edward P. Lazear
                                                    
Independent Director and Jack Steele Parker Professor of Human Resources Management and Economics, Stanford Graduate School of Business
                                                










                                                            Edward P. Lazear
                                                        

Independent Director and Jack Steele Parker Professor of Human Resources Management and Economics, Stanford Graduate School of Business
                                                        






Edward P. Lazear is widely recognized for his worldwide contributions as a labor economist and founder of a field known as personnel economics. He has been awarded extensively for his accomplishments as a teacher, author, and researcher.

Ed served as chairman of the President's Council of Economic Advisers and worked for the White House from 2006 to 2009. Previously, he was a senior fellow at the Hoover Institution from 1985 to 2002. He has also been an advisor to the governments of Czechoslovakia, Romania, Russia, Ukraine, and Georgia.

Prior to joining Stanford University in 1992, Professor Lazear taught for several years at what is now known as the University of Chicago Booth School of Business, where he was the Brown Professor of Urban and Labor Economics.










                                                        Eduardo Repetto
                                                    
Director
                                                










                                                            Eduardo Repetto
                                                        

Director
                                                        






Eduardo Repetto serves as Co-Chief Executive Officer, Co-Chief Investment Officer, and a Director of Dimensional Fund Advisors LP. He provides oversight across the investment, client service, marketing, and operational functions of the firm. He is also a Director and Officer of many of the subsidiaries of Dimensional Fund Advisors LP, which have offices around the world. Eduardo is a member of the Investment Committee and Investment Research Committee of Dimensional. He joined the firm in 2000. He has been a Director of the Dimensional US Mutual Funds since 2009, when he was elected by the shareholders of the funds. 

Eduardo obtained his PhD in aeronautics from the California Institute of Technology in 1998, where he received the William F. Ballhaus Prize for outstanding doctoral dissertation in aeronautics and the Ernest E. Sechler Memorial Award for his teaching and research efforts. Eduardo earned an MSc in engineering from Brown University and a diploma de honor in civil engineering from the Universidad de Buenos Aires. 









                                                        Myron S. Scholes
                                                    
Nobel laureate, Independent Director, and Frank E. Buck Professor Emeritus of Finance and Law, Stanford University
                                                










                                                            Myron S. Scholes
                                                        

Nobel laureate, Independent Director, and Frank E. Buck Professor Emeritus of Finance and Law, Stanford University
                                                        






A Frank E. Buck Professor Emeritus of Finance at the Stanford University Graduate School of Business, Myron S. Scholes is widely known for his seminal work in options pricing, capital markets, tax policy, and the financial services industry. He is co-originator of the Black-Scholes options pricing model, which is the basis of the pricing and risk-management technology that is used to value and manage the risk of financial instruments around the world. For this work, he received the Alfred Nobel Memorial Prize in Economic Sciences in 1997.

An expert in finance and tax law, Professor Scholes is chairman of Oak Hill Platinum Partners and a managing partner in the private and public investment groups of the Robert M. Bass organization. Oak Hill Platinum Partners, a hedge fund, specializes in providing inventory services in G7 fixed income markets to the global banking and dealer communities. He received a PhD from the University of Chicago, where he went on to serve as the Edward Eagle Brown Professor of Finance, and has also taught at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology Sloan School of Management.










                                                        Abbie J. Smith
                                                    
Independent Director and Boris and Irene Stern Professor of Accounting, University of Chicago
                                                










                                                            Abbie J. Smith
                                                        

Independent Director and Boris and Irene Stern Professor of Accounting, University of Chicago
                                                        






Abbie J. Smith is the Boris and Irene Stern Distinguished Service Professor of Accounting at the University of Chicago Booth School of Business. She has taught and conducted research in financial reporting, corporate governance, and capital markets since joining Chicago's faculty in 1980 following completion of her PhD at Cornell University. She received the McKinsey Award for Excellence in Teaching in 1990. She is a coeditor of the Journal of Accounting Research, an independent director of Dimensional's US mutual fund board, and a director of Chicago-based UBS Funds, HNI Corp., and Ryder System, Inc.















 
Media Center

 

 
Corporate Governance

 

 
Careers

 

















Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback





























dimensional fund advisors ltd
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Asset Management
Sub-Industry: Wealth Management
Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. provides investment advisory and wealth management services. The Company offers portfolio management, consulting, financial planning, and investment supervisory services. Dimensional Fund Advisors serves its clients worldwide.




Corporate Information
Address:

20 Triton Street
Regents Place
London, NW1 3BF
United Kingdom


Phone:
44-203-033-3300


Fax:
44-203-033-3324


Web url:
eu.dimensional.com





Board Members




Chairman/VP/Managing Director
Company










Co-CEO/Co-Chief Invsmt Officer
Company


Eduardo Repetto
Dimensional Fund Advisors LP








VP/CLO/Secy
Company


Catherine Newell
Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd








Board Members
Company


David Martin
Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd


























From The Web











Key Executives


Arthur H F Barlow "Art"


Chairman/VP/Managing Director




Eduardo Augusto Repetto


Co-CEO/Co-Chief Invsmt Officer




Christopher Scott Crossan "Chris"


Chief Compliance Officer




Gerard O'Reilly


Co-Chief Investment Officer




Gregory Hinkle


VP/CFO/Treasurer




Catherine Lee Newell


VP/CLO/Secy







Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data






































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














Mutual Funds | Dimensional














 









 








Mutual Funds
Dimensional has been translating financial science into practical investment solutions since 1981. Our equity and fixed income strategies combine rigorous research on the underlying drivers of returns with efficient execution in complex markets.





Clear AllHide FiltersSearchFiltersMutual FundsSearchCloseFiltersClear AllASSET CLASSASSET CLASS EquityFixed IncomeReal EstateGlobal AllocationCommoditiesTarget DateADDITIONAL FILTERSADDITIONAL FILTERS Socially ResponsibleSustainabilityApply Filters



PerformanceFund DocumentsView BenchmarkAS OF07/27/17MonthlyQuarterlyANNUALIZED NET RETURNS AS OF 06/30/17EXPENSE RATIO1PORTFOLIO NAMETICKERINCEPTION DATENAVYTD1 YEAR3 YEAR5 YEAR10 YEARSINCE INCEPTIONGROSSNETAsia Pacific Small Company Portfolio (I)DFRSX01/05/93$23.0012.03%14.95%1.86%5.76%2.33%8.16%0.64%0.54%Calif. Intermediate-Term Muni Bond PortfolioDCIBX11/29/11$10.642.54%-0.17%2.15%2.28%—2.51%0.23%0.23%Calif. Short-Term Muni Bond Portfolio (I)DFCMX04/02/07$10.341.24%0.18%0.83%0.82%1.75%1.77%0.22%0.22%Commodity Strategy PortfolioDCMSX11/09/10$5.85-4.09%-5.09%-13.45%-7.52%—-7.38%0.33%0.33%Continental Small Company Portfolio (I)DFCSX04/15/88$27.2123.13%33.68%7.11%17.29%3.57%9.92%0.64%0.54%Dimensional 2005 Target Date Ret Income FundDRIMX11/02/15$10.503.26%3.75%———4.24%2.04%0.21%Dimensional 2010 Target Date Ret Income FundDRIBX11/02/15$10.613.58%3.84%———4.95%0.89%0.21%Dimensional 2015 Target Date Ret Income FundDRIQX11/02/15$10.653.60%3.52%———5.33%0.47%0.21%Dimensional 2020 Target Date Ret Income FundDRIRX11/02/15$10.794.29%4.86%———6.30%0.37%0.23%Dimensional 2025 Target Date Ret Income FundDRIUX11/02/15$10.995.63%7.51%———7.35%0.37%0.25%Dimensional 2030 Target Date Ret Income FundDRIWX11/02/15$11.157.06%10.56%———8.01%0.43%0.26%Dimensional 2035 Target Date Ret Income FundDRIGX11/02/15$11.268.31%13.96%———8.29%0.52%0.28%Dimensional 2040 Target Date Ret Income FundDRIHX11/02/15$11.509.72%16.95%———9.36%0.52%0.28%Dimensional 2045 Target Date Ret Income FundDRIIX11/02/15$11.6510.49%18.48%———10.10%0.77%0.29%Dimensional 2050 Target Date Ret Income FundDRIJX11/02/15$11.6010.54%18.46%———10.12%0.75%0.29%Dimensional 2055 Target Date Ret Income FundDRIKX11/02/15$11.5910.41%18.37%———10.06%3.60%0.29%Dimensional 2060 Target Date Ret Income FundDRILX11/02/15$11.6110.50%18.44%———10.07%5.48%0.29%Dimensional Retirement Income FundTDIFX11/02/15$10.462.88%3.41%———3.71%2.01%0.22%Diversified Fixed Income PortfolioDFXIX08/10/16$9.771.43%————-1.05%0.45%0.15%Emerging Markets Core Equity Portfolio (I)DFCEX04/05/05$21.6019.00%21.94%1.65%4.69%2.77%8.13%0.53%0.53%Emerging Markets Portfolio (I)DFEMX04/25/94$28.5719.71%22.45%1.38%4.19%2.43%7.01%0.58%0.48%Emerging Markets Portfolio (II)DFETX08/14/97$27.4419.79%22.71%1.61%4.42%2.65%7.20%0.44%0.34%Emerging Markets Small Cap Portfolio (I)DEMSX03/05/98$22.6417.44%19.52%3.49%6.86%3.98%11.66%0.92%0.72%Emerging Markets Social Core Equity PortfolioDFESX08/31/06$13.8919.68%23.24%1.87%4.61%2.37%5.90%0.56%0.56%Emerging Markets Value Portfolio (I)DFEVX04/01/98$29.5317.42%27.59%0.78%3.83%1.36%10.36%0.66%0.56%Emerging Markets Value Portfolio (R2)DFEPX01/29/08$29.3517.28%27.33%0.54%3.57%—1.00%0.91%0.81%Enhanced US Large Co. Portfolio (I)DFELX07/02/96$13.959.49%17.71%9.70%14.73%7.48%8.52%0.23%0.15%Five-Year Global Fixed Income Portfolio (I)DFGBX11/06/90$11.001.56%-0.14%1.90%1.89%3.30%5.33%0.27%0.27%Global Allocation 25/75 Portfolio (I)DGTSX12/24/03$13.313.10%4.93%2.44%3.99%3.77%4.43%0.42%0.25%Global Allocation 25/75 Portfolio (R2)DFGPX12/24/03$13.282.98%4.72%2.07%3.66%3.39%4.08%0.67%0.50%Global Allocation 60/40 Portfolio (I)DGSIX12/24/03$17.396.32%11.96%3.96%8.10%4.71%6.40%0.50%0.28%Global Allocation 60/40 Portfolio (R2)DFPRX12/24/03$17.496.23%11.66%3.70%7.85%4.44%6.14%0.75%0.53%Global Equity Portfolio (I)DGEIX12/24/03$21.599.21%19.96%5.57%12.47%5.02%8.17%0.58%0.30%Global Equity Portfolio (R2)DGERX12/24/03$21.729.09%19.67%5.30%12.18%4.75%7.90%0.83%0.55%Global Real Estate Securities PortfolioDFGEX06/04/08$11.003.75%-1.78%5.56%8.37%—5.41%0.38%0.24%Global Small Company PortfolioDGLIX01/18/17$10.98—————7.40%0.75%0.49%Inflation-Protected Securities Portfolio (I)DIPSX09/18/06$11.761.16%-0.89%0.67%0.22%4.51%4.27%0.12%0.12%Intermediate Government Fixed Income Portfolio (I)DFIGX10/19/90$12.502.13%-2.53%2.30%1.62%4.65%6.22%0.12%0.12%Intermediate-Term Extended Quality PortfolioDFTEX07/20/10$10.853.67%0.37%3.59%3.36%—4.30%0.22%0.22%Intermediate-Term Muni Bond PortfolioDFTIX03/01/12$10.262.39%-0.25%2.10%1.91%—1.74%0.22%0.23%International Core Equity Portfolio (I)DFIEX09/15/05$13.5814.39%22.73%2.16%9.95%1.93%5.26%0.30%0.30%International High Relative Profitability PortfolioDIHRX05/16/17$10.21—————0.38%0.39%0.35%International Large Cap Growth PortfolioDILRX12/20/12$12.5016.85%16.30%1.88%——7.21%0.33%0.30%International Real Estate Securities Portfolio (I)DFITX03/01/07$5.146.38%-0.92%1.07%6.93%0.28%0.33%0.28%0.28%International Small Cap Growth PortfolioDISMX12/20/12$15.0719.60%22.53%6.51%——11.45%0.65%0.55%International Small Cap Value Portfolio (I)DISVX12/29/94$22.4514.55%28.80%4.16%13.74%3.55%7.91%0.68%0.68%International Small Company Portfolio (I)DFISX09/30/96$20.5916.39%24.07%4.56%12.26%3.69%7.31%0.53%0.53%International Social Core Equity PortfolioDSCLX11/01/12$13.0914.06%23.15%1.83%——8.17%0.37%0.37%International Sustainability Core 1 PortfolioDFSPX03/12/08$10.4315.79%22.72%1.91%9.40%—2.80%0.38%0.38%International Value Portfolio (I)DFIVX02/15/94$18.9010.43%25.92%-0.26%8.26%0.03%6.32%0.63%0.43%International Value Portfolio (II)DIVTX08/02/94$5.0710.30%26.17%-0.10%8.45%0.18%6.21%0.47%0.27%International Value Portfolio (III)DFVIX02/02/95$16.0110.48%25.95%-0.12%8.44%0.21%6.83%0.44%0.24%International Value Portfolio (R2)DFIPX04/30/08$18.8510.26%25.57%-0.53%7.98%—0.53%0.88%0.68%International Vector Equity PortfolioDFVQX08/14/08$12.7014.51%24.67%2.44%10.48%—5.47%0.49%0.49%Investment Grade PortfolioDFAPX03/07/11$10.902.60%-0.49%2.80%2.47%—3.71%0.22%0.22%Japanese Small Company Portfolio (I)DFJSX01/31/86$26.2916.27%25.94%10.22%12.30%5.60%5.63%0.64%0.54%Large Cap International Portfolio (I)DFALX07/17/91$22.6013.98%20.06%0.89%8.31%1.32%5.73%0.23%0.23%LTIP PortfolioDRXIX03/07/12$9.061.26%-3.68%0.43%-1.22%—0.21%0.21%0.15%LWAS/DFA Intl. High BtM PortfolioDFHBX06/10/93$8.2610.47%25.79%-0.35%8.21%-0.03%6.69%0.49%0.29%LWAS/DFA Two-Year Fixed PortfolioDFCFX06/06/96$9.990.73%0.57%0.69%0.56%1.45%3.01%0.21%0.21%LWAS/DFA Two-Year Govt. PortfolioDFYGX06/06/96$9.830.25%-0.05%0.42%0.36%1.39%3.01%0.20%0.20%LWAS/DFA US High BtM PortfolioDFBMX06/06/96$19.375.83%20.86%7.55%16.07%6.18%9.31%0.28%0.18%MN Municipal Bond PortfolioDMNBX07/25/17$10.00——————0.31%0.31%Municipal Bond PortfolioDFMPX03/10/15$10.242.11%0.01%———1.96%0.25%0.23%Municipal Real Return PortfolioDMREX11/04/14$9.961.61%1.25%———0.68%0.25%0.27%NY Municipal Bond PortfolioDNYMX06/16/15$10.281.83%0.21%———2.28%0.34%0.25%One-Year Fixed Income Portfolio (I)DFIHX07/25/83$10.310.60%0.63%0.60%0.54%1.34%4.68%0.17%0.17%Real Estate Securities Portfolio (I)DFREX01/05/93$35.362.50%-1.96%8.37%9.32%5.75%10.16%0.19%0.18%Selectively Hedged Global Equity Portfolio (I)DSHGX11/14/11$15.709.75%21.83%5.58%11.80%—11.28%0.64%0.35%Selectively Hedged Global Fixed PortfolioDFSHX01/09/08$9.722.65%1.42%-0.58%0.54%—1.06%0.17%0.17%Short-Duration Real Return PortfolioDFAIX11/05/13$9.950.51%1.32%0.23%——0.79%0.23%0.24%Short-Term Extended Quality PortfolioDFEQX03/04/09$10.871.55%0.60%1.68%1.70%—3.14%0.22%0.22%Short-Term Government PortfolioDFFGX06/01/87$10.640.75%-0.63%1.04%0.85%2.49%5.05%0.19%0.19%Short-Term Muni. Bond Portfolio (I)DFSMX08/20/02$10.221.30%0.16%0.84%0.73%1.62%1.78%0.22%0.22%Social Fixed Income PortfolioDSFIX04/05/16$9.912.58%-0.82%———0.52%0.56%0.26%TA US Core Equity 2 Portfolio (I)DFTCX10/04/07$16.806.46%19.85%7.46%14.71%—7.23%0.24%0.24%TA World ex US Core Equity PortfolioDFTWX03/06/08$11.0215.68%22.79%2.02%8.60%—3.20%0.37%0.37%Targeted Credit PortfolioDTCPX05/20/15$10.072.00%1.19%———2.07%0.24%0.20%Tax-Managed International Value PortfolioDTMIX04/16/99$15.5510.49%25.66%-0.47%7.94%0.17%5.76%0.53%0.53%Tax-Managed US Equity PortfolioDTMEX09/25/01$26.848.96%18.91%9.03%14.57%7.14%7.98%0.22%0.22%Tax-Managed US Marketwide Value PortfolioDTMMX12/14/98$29.305.40%19.32%7.49%15.82%6.32%7.62%0.57%0.37%Tax-Managed US Marketwide Value Portfolio (II)DFMVX12/16/98$27.375.48%19.51%7.66%15.99%6.48%7.74%0.42%0.22%Tax-Managed US Small Cap PortfolioDFTSX12/15/98$41.991.80%22.16%7.43%14.71%6.57%9.64%0.52%0.52%Tax-Managed US Targeted Value PortfolioDTMVX12/11/98$36.160.91%22.16%6.28%15.45%6.20%10.36%0.44%0.44%Two-Year Global Fixed Income Portfolio (I)DFGFX02/09/96$9.970.70%0.65%0.70%0.65%1.52%3.15%0.17%0.17%United Kingdom Small Company Portfolio (I)DFUKX03/04/86$31.3114.34%18.55%0.36%11.65%3.96%9.35%0.71%0.59%US Core Equity 1 Portfolio (I)DFEOX09/15/05$21.057.88%19.65%8.14%14.78%7.29%8.37%0.19%0.19%US Core Equity 2 Portfolio (I)DFQTX09/15/05$20.006.37%19.81%7.24%14.61%6.83%8.10%0.22%0.22%US High Relative Profitability PortfolioDURPX05/16/17$10.41—————1.86%0.29%0.25%US Large Cap Equity PortfolioDUSQX06/25/13$15.298.81%18.92%8.32%——12.50%0.17%0.18%US Large Cap Growth PortfolioDUSLX12/20/12$17.3310.24%16.54%9.36%——14.49%0.20%0.20%US Large Cap Value Portfolio (I)DFLVX02/19/93$37.375.82%20.86%7.58%16.13%6.25%10.25%0.37%0.27%US Large Cap Value Portfolio (II)DFCVX08/02/94$18.475.87%20.99%7.72%16.27%6.36%10.53%0.25%0.15%US Large Cap Value Portfolio (III)DFUVX02/02/95$26.265.86%21.03%7.73%16.29%6.39%10.93%0.23%0.13%US Large Company PortfolioDFUSX09/23/99$19.269.31%17.87%9.56%14.55%7.18%5.64%0.08%0.08%US Micro Cap Portfolio (I)DFSCX12/23/81$21.331.60%24.05%7.66%14.95%7.16%12.02%0.52%0.52%US Small Cap Growth PortfolioDSCGX12/20/12$17.395.37%20.08%7.60%——14.11%0.39%0.40%US Small Cap Portfolio (I)DFSTX03/19/92$34.771.91%21.56%7.25%14.61%7.95%10.63%0.37%0.37%US Small Cap Value Portfolio (I)DFSVX03/02/93$37.01-1.90%21.86%4.72%13.97%5.89%11.78%0.52%0.52%US Social Core Equity 2 PortfolioDFUEX10/01/07$14.916.12%21.02%6.60%14.11%—6.41%0.28%0.28%US Sustainability Core 1 PortfolioDFSIX03/12/08$19.618.42%20.42%8.05%14.78%—9.47%0.26%0.25%US Targeted Value Portfolio (I)DFFVX02/23/00$24.14-0.37%21.55%5.13%14.54%6.55%11.60%0.37%0.37%US Targeted Value Portfolio (R1)DFTVX01/31/08$24.14-0.37%21.45%5.03%14.44%—9.25%0.47%0.47%US Targeted Value Portfolio (R2)DFTPX06/30/08$24.02-0.49%21.18%4.86%14.26%—10.08%0.62%0.62%US Vector Equity Portfolio (I)DFVEX12/30/05$18.353.48%21.47%6.16%14.47%6.28%7.84%0.32%0.32%VA Equity Allocation Portfolio—07/10/17$10.24——————0.59%0.36%VA Global Bond Portfolio—01/12/95$10.821.70%-0.11%1.99%1.94%3.47%4.98%0.24%0.24%VA Global Moderate Allocation Portfolio—04/08/13$12.406.46%12.86%3.79%——6.66%0.52%0.40%VA International Small Portfolio—10/03/95$13.6316.07%24.20%4.74%12.29%3.98%7.14%0.60%0.60%VA International Value Portfolio—10/03/95$12.7910.22%25.98%-0.48%7.85%-0.11%6.37%0.46%0.46%VA Short-Term Fixed Portfolio—10/03/95$10.250.59%0.69%0.54%0.47%1.27%2.83%0.27%0.27%VA US Large Value Portfolio—01/12/95$25.755.80%20.80%7.24%16.05%6.31%9.56%0.27%0.27%VA US Targeted Value Portfolio—10/03/95$19.54-0.26%22.74%5.64%15.25%5.80%10.88%0.38%0.38%VIT Inflation Protected Securities Portfolio—05/29/15$10.081.11%-0.95%———0.90%0.19%0.18%World Core Equity Portfolio (I)DREIX03/07/12$15.3711.43%20.96%5.00%11.60%—10.50%0.64%0.35%World ex US Core Equity PortfolioDFWIX04/09/13$11.6415.39%22.64%1.84%——5.37%0.39%0.39%World Ex US Government Fixed Income Portfolio (I)DWFIX12/06/11$10.091.00%-0.94%4.51%4.06%—4.42%0.22%0.20%World ex US Targeted Value PortfolioDWUSX11/01/12$14.4416.61%27.85%3.69%——9.83%0.76%0.76%World ex US Value PortfolioDFWVX08/23/10$12.0612.54%26.56%0.43%7.72%—5.19%0.76%0.53%PORTFOLIO NAMEProspectusSummaryProspectusSAIAnnualReportSemiannualReportFact SheetHoldingsXBRLAsia Pacific Small Company Portfolio (I)Calif. Intermediate-Term Muni Bond PortfolioCalif. Short-Term Muni Bond Portfolio (I)Commodity Strategy PortfolioContinental Small Company Portfolio (I)Dimensional 2005 Target Date Ret Income Fund-Dimensional 2010 Target Date Ret Income Fund-Dimensional 2015 Target Date Ret Income Fund-Dimensional 2020 Target Date Ret Income Fund-Dimensional 2025 Target Date Ret Income Fund-Dimensional 2030 Target Date Ret Income Fund-Dimensional 2035 Target Date Ret Income Fund-Dimensional 2040 Target Date Ret Income Fund-Dimensional 2045 Target Date Ret Income Fund-Dimensional 2050 Target Date Ret Income Fund-Dimensional 2055 Target Date Ret Income Fund-Dimensional 2060 Target Date Ret Income Fund-Dimensional Retirement Income Fund-Diversified Fixed Income Portfolio-Emerging Markets Core Equity Portfolio (I)Emerging Markets Portfolio (I)Emerging Markets Portfolio (II)Emerging Markets Small Cap Portfolio (I)Emerging Markets Social Core Equity PortfolioEmerging Markets Value Portfolio (I)Emerging Markets Value Portfolio (R2)Enhanced US Large Co. Portfolio (I)Five-Year Global Fixed Income Portfolio (I)Global Allocation 25/75 Portfolio (I)Global Allocation 25/75 Portfolio (R2)Global Allocation 60/40 Portfolio (I)Global Allocation 60/40 Portfolio (R2)Global Equity Portfolio (I)Global Equity Portfolio (R2)Global Real Estate Securities PortfolioGlobal Small Company Portfolio--Inflation-Protected Securities Portfolio (I)Intermediate Government Fixed Income Portfolio (I)Intermediate-Term Extended Quality PortfolioIntermediate-Term Muni Bond PortfolioInternational Core Equity Portfolio (I)International High Relative Profitability Portfolio------International Large Cap Growth PortfolioInternational Real Estate Securities Portfolio (I)International Small Cap Growth PortfolioInternational Small Cap Value Portfolio (I)International Small Company Portfolio (I)International Social Core Equity PortfolioInternational Sustainability Core 1 PortfolioInternational Value Portfolio (I)International Value Portfolio (II)International Value Portfolio (III)International Value Portfolio (R2)International Vector Equity PortfolioInvestment Grade PortfolioJapanese Small Company Portfolio (I)Large Cap International Portfolio (I)LTIP PortfolioLWAS/DFA Intl. High BtM PortfolioLWAS/DFA Two-Year Fixed PortfolioLWAS/DFA Two-Year Govt. PortfolioLWAS/DFA US High BtM PortfolioMN Municipal Bond Portfolio------Municipal Bond PortfolioMunicipal Real Return PortfolioNY Municipal Bond PortfolioOne-Year Fixed Income Portfolio (I)Real Estate Securities Portfolio (I)Selectively Hedged Global Equity Portfolio (I)Selectively Hedged Global Fixed PortfolioShort-Duration Real Return PortfolioShort-Term Extended Quality PortfolioShort-Term Government PortfolioShort-Term Muni. Bond Portfolio (I)Social Fixed Income PortfolioTA US Core Equity 2 Portfolio (I)TA World ex US Core Equity PortfolioTargeted Credit PortfolioTax-Managed International Value PortfolioTax-Managed US Equity PortfolioTax-Managed US Marketwide Value PortfolioTax-Managed US Marketwide Value Portfolio (II)Tax-Managed US Small Cap PortfolioTax-Managed US Targeted Value PortfolioTwo-Year Global Fixed Income Portfolio (I)United Kingdom Small Company Portfolio (I)US Core Equity 1 Portfolio (I)US Core Equity 2 Portfolio (I)US High Relative Profitability Portfolio------US Large Cap Equity PortfolioUS Large Cap Growth PortfolioUS Large Cap Value Portfolio (I)US Large Cap Value Portfolio (II)US Large Cap Value Portfolio (III)US Large Company PortfolioUS Micro Cap Portfolio (I)US Small Cap Growth PortfolioUS Small Cap Portfolio (I)US Small Cap Value Portfolio (I)US Social Core Equity 2 PortfolioUS Sustainability Core 1 PortfolioUS Targeted Value Portfolio (I)US Targeted Value Portfolio (R1)US Targeted Value Portfolio (R2)US Vector Equity Portfolio (I)VA Equity Allocation Portfolio------VA Global Bond PortfolioVA Global Moderate Allocation PortfolioVA International Small PortfolioVA International Value PortfolioVA Short-Term Fixed PortfolioVA US Large Value PortfolioVA US Targeted Value PortfolioVIT Inflation Protected Securities PortfolioWorld Core Equity Portfolio (I)World ex US Core Equity PortfolioWorld Ex US Government Fixed Income Portfolio (I)World ex US Targeted Value PortfolioWorld ex US Value Portfolio1Under certain circumstances, the Advisor has contractually agreed to waive certain fees and/or assume certain expenses of the Portfolio. Unless otherwise stated in the prospectus, the Advisor may amend or discontinue the waivers at any time, one year from the date of the prospectus. The net expense ratio reflects the total annual fund operating expenses of the Portfolio after taking into account any such fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement arrangements. Please read the Portfolio’s prospectus for details and more information.







Information regarding The DFA Short Term Investment Fund provided to satisfy the requirements of Rule 2a-7 under the Investment Company Act of 1940 may be found here. Shares of The DFA Short Term Investment Fund have not been registered under the Securities Act of 1933 and are not being offered to the public.








Performance is reported net of all advisory fees and includes reinvestment of dividends and other earnings.  Performance data shown represents past performance and is no guarantee of future results. Current performance may be higher or lower than the performance shown. The investment return and principal value of an investment will fluctuate so that an investor's shares, when redeemed, may be worth more or less than their original cost.  








Performance less than one year is not annualized.








Indices are not available for direct investment; therefore, their performance does not reflect the expenses associated with the management of an actual portfolio. 








Dimensional Fund Advisors LP is an investment advisor registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Consider the investment objectives, risks, and charges and expenses of the Dimensional funds carefully before investing. For this and other information about the Dimensional funds, please read the prospectus carefully before investing. Prospectuses are available by calling Dimensional Fund Advisors collect at (512) 306-7400 or at us.dimensional.com. Dimensional funds are distributed by DFA Securities LLC.








The following portfolios are restricted to specific institutional accounts:  US Large Cap Value Portfolio II, US Large Cap Value Portfolio III, Tax-Mgd. US Mktwd. Value Portfolio II, Intl. Value Portfolio II, Intl. Value Portfolio III, Emerging Markets Portfolio II. 
Prior to February 28, 2015, the LTIP Portfolio was the Dimensional Retirement Fixed Income Fund III. 








Click here to retrieve our Definitions of Terms Document.








Top Holdings - latest 
 



















Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - Elis SA - Ordinary shares 








































































English
Français











Register
Sign In












Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - Elis SA - Ordinary shares




















June 08, 2017 07:15 ET

 | Source: Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd.





 FORM 8.3 PUBLIC OPENING POSITION DISCLOSURE/DEALING DISCLOSURE BY A PERSON WITH INTERESTS IN RELEVANT SECURITIES REPRESENTING 1% OR MORERule 8.3 of the Takeover Code (the "Code") 1.         KEY INFORMATION  (a) Full name of discloser:           Dimensional Fund   Advisors Ltd. ("Dimensional"), in its capacity as investment manager and on   behalf its affiliates who are also investment managers. Dimensional and its   affiliates expressly disclaim beneficial ownership of the shares described in   this form 8.3    (b) Owner or controller of interests and short positions   disclosed, if different from 1(a):     The naming of nominee or vehicle companies is   insufficient.  For a trust, the trustee(s), settlor and beneficiaries must be   named.                (c) Name of offeror/offeree in relation to whose relevant   securities this form relates:     Use a separate form for each offeror/offeree           Elis SA(FR0012435121)       (d) If an exempt fund manager connected with an   offeror/offeree, state this and specify identity of offeror/offeree:                (e) Date position held/dealing undertaken:     For an opening position disclosure, state the latest   practicable date prior to the disclosure           7 June 2017    (f)  In addition to the company in 1(c) above, is the   discloser making disclosures in respect of any other party to the offer?     If it is a cash offer or possible cash offer, state   "N/A"           YESIf YES, specify   which:                    Berendsen Plc(GB00B0F99717)                2.         POSITIONS OF THE PERSON MAKING THE DISCLOSURE If there are positions or rights to subscribe to disclose in more than one class of relevant securities of the offeror or offeree named in 1(c), copy table 2(a) or (b) (as appropriate) for each additional class of relevant security. (a)        Interests and short positions in the relevant securities of the offeror or offeree to which the disclosure relates following the dealing (if any)  Class of relevant   security:         EUR 10.00 Ordinary Shares            Interests     Short   positions     Number     %     Number     %  (1) Relevant securities owned and/or controlled:       597,537*         0.43                (2) Cash-settled derivatives:                            (3) Stock-settled derivatives (including options) and   agreements to purchase/sell:                                                                                                                       TOTAL:       597,537         0.43                *Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. and / or its affiliates do not control voting discretion for 20,620 shares. All interests and all short positions should be disclosed. Details of any open stock-settled derivative positions (including traded options), or agreements to purchase or sell relevant securities, should be given on a Supplemental Form 8 (Open Positions). (b)        Rights to subscribe for new securities (including directors' and other employee options)  Class of   relevant security in relation to which subscription right exists:        Details, including   nature of the rights concerned and relevant percentages:        3.         DEALINGS (IF ANY) BY THE PERSON MAKING THE DISCLOSURE Where there have been dealings in more than one class of relevant securities of the offeror or offeree named in 1(c), copy table 3(a), (b), (c) or (d) (as appropriate) for each additional class of relevant security dealt in. The currency of all prices and other monetary amounts should be stated. (a)        Purchases and sales  Class of relevant   security     Purchase/sale       Number of securities     Price per unit    Ordinary   shares             Purchase             2,122             EUR 20.0568    (b)        Cash-settled derivative transactions  Class of   relevant security     Product   descriptione.g. CFD     Nature of dealinge.g.   opening/closing a long/short position, increasing/reducing a long/short   position     Number of reference   securities     Price per   unit                                                                 (c)        Stock-settled derivative transactions (including options) (i)         Writing, selling, purchasing or varying  Class of   relevant security     Product   description e.g. call option     Writing, purchasing,   selling, varying etc.     Number of   securities to which option relates     Exercise price   per unit     Typee.g.   American, European etc.     Expiry   date     Option   money paid/ received per unit                                                                                                           (ii)        Exercise  Class of   relevant security     Product   descriptione.g. call   option     Exercising/   exercised against     Number of   securities     Exercise   price per unit                             (d)        Other dealings (including subscribing for new securities)  Class   of relevant security     Nature   of dealinge.g.   subscription, conversion     Details     Price   per unit (if applicable)                       4.         OTHER INFORMATION (a)        Indemnity and other dealing arrangements  Details of   any indemnity or option arrangement, or any agreement or understanding,   formal or informal, relating to relevant securities which may be an   inducement to deal or refrain from dealing entered into by the person making   the disclosure and any party to the offer or any person acting in concert with   a party to the offer:Irrevocable   commitments and letters of intent should not be included.  If there are no   such agreements, arrangements or understandings, state "none"                 (b)        Agreements, arrangements or understandings relating to options or derivatives  Details of any   agreement, arrangement or understanding, formal or informal, between the   person making the disclosure and any other person relating to:(i)  the voting rights of any relevant securities under   any option; or (ii) the voting rights or future acquisition or disposal   of any relevant securities to which any derivative is referenced:If there are no such   agreements, arrangements or understandings, state "none"                 (c)        Attachments  Is a Supplemental   Form 8 (Open Positions) attached?           NO      Date of disclosure:     8 June 2017  Contact name:     Joann Kong  Telephone number:     020 3033 4876  Public disclosures under Rule 8 of the Code must be made to a Regulatory Information Service and must also be emailed to the Takeover Panel at monitoring@disclosure.org.uk.  The Panel's Market Surveillance Unit is available for consultation in relation to the Code's disclosure requirements on +44 (0)20 7638 0129. The Code can be viewed on the Panel's website at www.thetakeoverpanel.org.uk. 


Related Articles
other press releases by Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd.


Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - Tesco Plc - Ordinary shares
July 28, 2017 05:30


Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - Kennedy-Wilson Holdings Inc - Common stock
July 28, 2017 05:26


Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - Tesco Plc - Ordinary shares
July 27, 2017 07:28


Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - Kennedy-Wilson Holdings Inc - Common stock
July 27, 2017 07:26


Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - Tesco Plc - Ordinary shares
July 26, 2017 07:07








Profile

Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd.





  Subscribe via RSS
 Subscribe via ATOM
 Javascript



  London, 



















Newswire Distribution Network & Management



Home
Newsroom
RSS Feeds
Legal
Contact Us






About Us
GlobeNewswire, a Nasdaq company, is one of the world's largest newswire distribution networks, specializing in the delivery of corporate press releases financial disclosures and multimedia content to the media, investment community, individual investors and the general public.
            




Contact Us


Corporate Headquarters
2321 Rosecrans Avenue.
Suite 2200
El Segundo, CA 90245
Phone: (800) 307-6627
Fax:  (800) 307-3567
            


European Headquarters
Woolgate Exchange,
25 Basinghall Street,
London EC2V 5HA
UK
Phone: +1 866-465-8454




© 2017 GlobeNewswire, Inc. All Rights Reserved.









Dimensional Investing | Dimensional Fund Advisors














 









 












Dimensional Investing is about implementing the great ideas in finance
for our clients.




Scroll







Dimensional* at a Glance


As of June 30, 2017                   




                                    36
                                

                                    Years since founding
                                



                                    $518B
                                

                                    In firmwide assets under management, USD (in billions)
                                



                                    12
                                

                                    Offices in eight countries
                                



                                    1,100+
                                

                                    Employees globally
                                







                                    Letter from the Chairman
                                


                                    Founder and Executive Chairman David Booth reflects on the importance of having an investment philosophy you can stick with over the long-term.
                                
Read more 


                                    Dimensional Named “Retirement Leader of the Year”
                                


                                    Dimensional Fund Advisors is honored to be named “2017 Retirement Leader of the Year” by Fund Intelligence.
                                
Learn more 


                                    Find an Advisor Near You
                                


                                    Use our “Find an Advisor” tool to connect with professionals in your area who use Dimensional funds.
                                
Learn more 


                                    Next Generation Target Date Solution
                                


                                    Dimensional’s Target Date Retirement Income Funds are designed to focus on income growth and a more complete risk management framework.
                                
Read more 










How do Dimensional’s results compare to the industry?


















Performance data shown represents past performance and is no guarantee of future results. Beginning sample includes funds as of January 1, 2002. The number of beginners is: Industry- 3,545 and Dimensional- 29. Outperformers (winners) are funds with return observations for every month of the 15-year period whose cumulative net return over the period exceeded that of their respective benchmark. US-domiciled open-end mutual fund data is from Morningstar and Center for Research in Security Prices (CRSP) from the University of Chicago.  Equity fund sample includes the Morningstar historical categories: Diversified Emerging Markets, Europe Stock, Foreign Large Blend, Foreign Large Growth, Foreign Large Value, Foreign Small/Mid Blend, Foreign Small/Mid Growth, Foreign Small/Mid Value, Japan Stock, Large Blend, Large Growth, Large Value, Mid-Cap Blend, Mid-Cap Value, Miscellaneous Region, Pacific/Asia ex-Japan Stock, Small Blend, Small Growth, Small Value, and World Stock. Fixed income fund sample includes the Morningstar historical categories: Corporate Bond, Inflation-Protected Bond, Intermediate Government, Intermediate-Term Bond, Muni California Intermediate, Muni National Intermediate, Muni National Short, Muni New York Intermediate, Muni Single State Short, Short Government, Short-Term Bond, Ultrashort Bond, and World Bond. Index funds and fund-of-funds are excluded from the sample.The return for funds with multiple share classes is taken as the asset-weighted average of the individual share class observations. Performance of each fund in the industry sample are evaluated relative to the fund’s Morningstar Category Index. Dimensional fund data provided by the fund accountant. Dimensional funds exclude VA funds and those distributed exclusively through Loring Ward.Performance of Dimensional funds measured against prospectus benchmarks. When evaluating the Dimensional funds relative to the fund’s Morningstar category index, 79% outperform. For further methodology details, see the Mutual Fund Landscape brochure.








Do you have an investment approach you can stay with during turbulent markets?


















In USD. Industry net new cash flow data provided by Investment Company Institute© based on the approximately 4,600 US-domiciled equity (domestic and international) mutual funds reported on an aggregate level to the Investment Company Institute©. This includes information on Dimensional’s US-domiciled funds during this period. Dimensional estimated net flow data provided by Morningstar based on Dimensional’s US-domiciled equity mutual funds. For illustrative purposes only. 










01
An enduring belief in the
Power of  Markets









                Capital Markets Have RewardedLong-Term Investors
            

                Growth of $1 USD, Jan. 1926–Dec. 2016
            




















          In USD. Indices are not available for direct investment. Their performance does not reflect the expenses associated with the management of an actual portfolio. US Small Cap is the CRSP 6–10 Index; US Large Cap is the S&P 500 Index. Treasury Bills is the IA SBBI US 30 Day TBill TR USD, provided by Ibbotson Associates via Morningstar Direct. Long-Term Government Bonds is the IA SBBI US LT Govt TR USD, provided by Ibbotson Associates via Morningstar Direct. US Inflation is measured as changes in the US Consumer Price Index. US Consumer Price Index data is provided by the US Department of Labor Bureau of Labor Statistics. CRSP data is provided by the Center for Research in Security Prices, University of Chicago. The S&P data is provided by Standard & Poor’s Index Services Group. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
        











At Dimensional, our investment approach is based on a belief in markets.

Rather than relying on futile forecasting or trying to outguess others, we draw information about expected returns from the market itself—letting the collective knowledge of its millions of buyers and sellers set security prices.

Letting markets do what they do best—drive information into prices—frees us to spend time where we believe we have an advantage, namely in how we interpret the research, how we design and manage portfolios, and how we service our clients. It means we take a less subjective, more systematic approach to investing—an approach we can implement consistently and investors can understand and stick with, even in challenging market environments.





                                        Read more
                                    






                            How Many Funds Outperformed Benchmarks?
                        







Only 18% of equity and fixed income funds that were around at the start of 2002 beat their Morningstar Category index, 15 years later. Over the same time period, 83% of equity and fixed income Dimensional funds outperformed their prospectus benchmarks. The figures are drawn from a selected universe of industry and Dimensional funds available in the US. Please refer to the disclosure for more details.









 
            





Performance data shown represents past performance and is no guarantee of future results. Beginning sample includes funds as of January 1, 2002. The number of beginners is: Industry- 3,545 and Dimensional- 29. Outperformers (winners) are funds with return observations for every month of the 15-year period whose cumulative net return over the period exceeded that of their respective benchmark. US-domiciled open-end mutual fund data is from Morningstar and Center for Research in Security Prices (CRSP) from the University of Chicago.  Equity fund sample includes the Morningstar historical categories: Diversified Emerging Markets, Europe Stock, Foreign Large Blend, Foreign Large Growth, Foreign Large Value, Foreign Small/Mid Blend, Foreign Small/Mid Growth, Foreign Small/Mid Value, Japan Stock, Large Blend, Large Growth, Large Value, Mid-Cap Blend, Mid-Cap Value, Miscellaneous Region, Pacific/Asia ex-Japan Stock, Small Blend, Small Growth, Small Value, and World Stock. Fixed income fund sample includes the Morningstar historical categories: Corporate Bond, Inflation-Protected Bond, Intermediate Government, Intermediate-Term Bond, Muni California Intermediate, Muni National Intermediate, Muni National Short, Muni New York Intermediate, Muni Single State Short, Short Government, Short-Term Bond, Ultrashort Bond, and World Bond. Index funds and fund-of-funds are excluded from the sample.The return for funds with multiple share classes is taken as the asset-weighted average of the individual share class observations. Performance of each fund in the industry sample are evaluated relative to the fund’s Morningstar Category Index. Dimensional fund data provided by the fund accountant. Dimensional funds exclude VA funds and those distributed exclusively through Loring Ward.Performance of Dimensional funds measured against prospectus benchmarks. When evaluating the Dimensional funds relative to the fund’s Morningstar category index, 79% outperform. For further methodology details, see the Mutual Fund Landscape brochure.



















                                        David Booth
                                    
Founder and Executive Chairman                                    
                                

                            “The number of managers that can successfully pick stocks are fewer than you’d expect by chance. So, why even play that game? You don’t need to.” 

                        




                                David Booth
                            

                            Founder and Executive Chairman
                            
                        









02
Applying insights from
 FINANCIAL SCIENCE









 Breakthroughs in Modern Finance 








1966Efficient Market Hypothesis
 






Efficient Market Hypothesis
Eugene Fama
                  Nobel laureate, 2013
                  Professor, University of Chicago

Eugene Fama’s efficient market hypothesis marks a pivotal moment for modern finance. The essence of the argument can be described by the simple statement that security prices reflect all available information.









1973Intertemporal CAPM
 


 



Intertemporal CAPM
Robert Merton
                    Nobel laureate, 1997
                    Professor, MIT

The ICAPM set up a theoretical framework for how multiple sources of risk could arise. It expanded on the one-period CAPM model where the only priced risk was market beta.









1981Small Cap Investing
 


 



Small Cap Investing
Dimensional Fund Advisors
                    David Booth, Founder
                    and Executive Chairman

Dimensional pioneers small cap investing with the launch of its first strategy, which offers investors diversified, efficient access to small company stocks.






1981 Dimensional Founded



1983Term Structure
 






Term Structure
Eugene Fama
                    Nobel laureate, 2013
                    Professor, University of Chicago

Research shows implied forward interest rates provide information on expected term premiums in fixed income.







1992Value Breakthrough
 






Value Breakthrough
Eugene Fama
                    Nobel laureate, 2013
                    Professor, University of Chicago
Kenneth French
                    Professor, Dartmouth College

Eugene Fama and Kenneth French develop the three-factor asset pricing model, which identifies market, size, and price (value) factors as the principal drivers of equity returns.









2012Profitability
 


 



Profitability
Eugene Fama
                    Nobel laureate, 2013
                    Professor, University of Chicago
Kenneth French
                    Professor, Dartmouth College
Robert Novy-Marx
                    Professor, University of Rochester

A body of academic research led to identifying profitability as a dimension of higher expected returns that can be pursued across equity markets.









Today
 


 












 Dimensional’s Research and Investment teams draw insight from academia, but what sets us apart is how we interpret, test, and apply that research to practical investment solutions for our clients. 




Tomorrow
...
 


 Dimensional was built around a set of ideas bigger than the firm itself. With a confidence in markets, deep connections to the academic community, and a focus on implementation, we go where the science leads, and continue to pursue new insights, both large and small, that can benefit our clients. 

















 Eugene Fama and Kenneth French are members of the Board of Directors for and provide consulting services to Dimensional Fund Advisors LP. Robert Merton and Robert Novy-Marx provide consulting services to Dimensional Fund Advisors LP. 


 








Dimensional’s investment approach is grounded in economic theory and backed by decades of empirical research.


Our internal team of researchers works closely with leading financial economists to better understand where returns come from.


Research has shown that securities that offer higher expected returns share certain characteristics, which we call dimensions. To be considered a dimension, these characteristics must be sensible, persistent over time, pervasive across markets, and cost-effective to capture.





                                        Read More 
                                    






                                The Evolution of Indexing and Dimensional
                            


















                                        Eugene Fama
                                    
Nobel laureate, 2013 Professor, University of Chicago; Director and Consultant, Dimensional                                    
                                

                            “We’re very careful in looking at new research that comes along and making sure it’s robust.” 

                        




                                Eugene Fama
                            

                            Nobel laureate, 2013 Professor, University of Chicago; Director and Consultant, Dimensional
                            
                        












Understanding what drives returns is the starting point. From here, we focus on fine-tuning our method of capturing them.


We structure broadly diversified portfolios that emphasize the dimensions of higher expected returns, while addressing the tradeoffs that arise when executing portfolios.


Every day our portfolio managers and traders seek to balance costs against expected returns and diversification. We work for the slightest expected gain, as every incremental improvement can add up over time.





                                        Read More
                                    






                            The Gap Between Realityand a Model
                        







Limitations
of the Model


False
Positives

Insights



MODEL
REALITY









                 Academic models provide useful insight, but they are incomplete. It’s in the gap between reality and a model where sound judgment and experience matter.
            





                                        Watch
                                        
                                            Dimensional Stories: Models
                                            (03:07)
                                        














                                        Eduardo Repetto
                                    
Co-Chief Executive Officer; Co-Chief Investment Officer                                    
                                

                            “The money we manage is not our money—it’s our clients’ past and their future. We take that responsibility very seriously.”

                        




                                Eduardo Repetto
                            

                            Co-Chief Executive Officer; Co-Chief Investment Officer
                            
                        







 


03

A commitment 
TO OUR CLIENTS









                The Global Financial Crisis and Its Aftermath 
            

                A key to a good long-term investment experience is being able to stay with your investment philosophy, even during tough times. During the rocky 2008–2012 period, many investors sold their equity funds. Dimensional’s equity funds had inflows throughout the period, which could suggest that in aggregate investors were prepared to withstand the market’s movements in order to pursue long-term results.
            




















        In USD. Dimensional estimated net flow data provided by Morningstar based on Dimensional’s US-domiciled equity mutual funds. Industry net new cash flow data provided by Investment Company Institute© based on the approximately 4,600 US-domiciled equity (domestic and international) mutual funds reported on an aggregate level to the Investment Company Institute©. This includes information on Dimensional’s US-domiciled funds during this period. For illustrative purposes only.
        












Dimensional Investing is about providing a successful investment experience.


That means more than considering investment returns. It means offering peace of mind knowing that a transparent approach backed by decades of research is powering every decision.


Markets go up and they go down. The goal of Dimensional Investing is to help people be prepared, so they can stick with their plan.





                                        Read more
                                    






Institutional Investor’s2016 Money Masters
                            


















                                        DAVE BUTLER 
                                    
Co-Chief Executive Officer and Head of Global Financial Advisor Services                                    
                                

                            “The client experience has always been, and will continue to be, why we do what we do.” 

                        




                                DAVE BUTLER 
                            

                            Co-Chief Executive Officer and Head of Global Financial Advisor Services
                            
                        










*“Dimensional” refers to the Dimensional separate but affiliated entities generally, rather than to one particular entity. These entities are Dimensional Fund Advisors LP, Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd., DFA Australia Limited, Dimensional Fund Advisors Canada ULC, Dimensional Fund Advisors Pte. Ltd., and Dimensional Japan Ltd.








Dimensional Fund Advisors LP is an investment advisor registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Consider the investment objectives, risks, and charges and expenses of the Dimensional funds carefully before investing. For this and other information about the Dimensional funds, please read the prospectus carefully before investing. Prospectuses are available by calling Dimensional Fund Advisors collect at (512) 306-7400 or at us.dimensional.com. Dimensional funds are distributed by DFA Securities LLC. None of the other Dimensional entities are currently licensed by, registered with, or supervised by the Securities and Exchange Commission. Nothing on this website shall constitute or serve as an offer to sell products or services in any country or jurisdiction by any Dimensional global firm. For informational purposes only. All information is given in good faith and without warranty and should not be considered investment advice or an offer of any security for sale.








Eugene Fama is a member of the Board of Directors for and provides consulting services to Dimensional Fund Advisors LP.








Research Dimensional Fund Advisors and DFA Securities with FINRA's BrokerCheck.








Profitability is a measure of current profitability, based on information from individual companies’ income statements. 




















Individual Investors | Dimensional














 









 









                    Individuals
                


Individuals can invest in Dimensional funds through a select group of financial advisors.


We believe an advisor can work closely with you to understand your financial needs and provide a range of wealth management services, while encouraging the discipline essential to long-term investment success.
Dimensional’s Find an Advisor tool can help you locate an advisor near you.





Find an Advisor 

Financial advisors who work with Dimensional operate independently from Dimensional and vary in the extent to which they use Dimensional Funds.
To find an advisor nearest you,* select one of the options below and enter your zip code.


Find an Advisor




Advisors who primarily use Dimensional funds**



No preference





Enter Zip Code








Submit


* All advisors shown in the search results manage at least $20 million in total assets and have used Dimensional funds for at least one year (based on data known to Dimensional).


** Advisors who primarily use Dimensional funds have over 40% of firm assets invested in Dimensional funds (based on data known to Dimensional).












                                #8
                            

Eighth largest US mutual fund family
 
Source: Morningstar Direct Asset Flow. As of November 30, 2016.



                                Zero
                            

Loads paid to advisors by Dimensional US mutual funds



                                28 Years
                            

                                Working with financial advisors in the US
                            







                Financial Advisors on Investing
            
When you see markets differently, you live your life differently. Hear financial advisors address common investment questions and discover how qualified advice can improve your investment experience. 

﻿


        




                                                        How Do I Handle the Ups and Downs in the Market?
                                                    












                                                        Why Should I Invest Internationally?
                                                    












                                                        Is Now a Good Time to Be in the Market?
                                                    












Show More +







Dimensional Fund Advisors LP does not endorse, recommend, or guarantee the services of any advisor. The experience of the speaker may not be representative of the experiences of other individuals. There is no guarantee an investing strategy will be successful.













                                        ROBERT MERTON
                                    
Nobel laureate, 1997 Professor, MIT; Resident Scientist, Dimensional Holdings                                    
                                

                            “Knowing that someone has the incentive to work for you, rather than do something else, is pretty fundamental.”

                        




                                ROBERT MERTON
                            

                            Nobel laureate, 1997 Professor, MIT; Resident Scientist, Dimensional Holdings
                            
                        











Find  an Advisor tool for informational purposes only. Dimensional makes no representation as to the suitability of any advisor, and we do not endorse, recommend, or guarantee the services of any advisor. We urge you to carefully evaluate any advisor whom you may consider hiring. You are responsible for monitoring your advisor’s investment performance. We will not supervise or monitor the advisor’s activities or your account, nor are we responsible for the performance of your investments. We have no discretionary authority or control with respect to how your advisor manages your investment assets. We disclaim any responsibility or liability for any damages arising from your decision to engage the services of an advisor.








Dimensional Fund Advisors LP is an investment advisor registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Consider the investment objectives, risks, and charges and expenses of the Dimensional funds carefully before investing. For this and other information about the Dimensional funds, please read the prospectus carefully before investing. Prospectuses are available by calling Dimensional Fund Advisors collect at (512) 306-7400 or at us.dimensional.com. Dimensional funds are distributed by DFA Securities LLC. None of the other Dimensional entities are currently licensed by, registered with, or supervised by the Securities and Exchange Commission. Nothing on this website shall constitute or serve as an offer to sell products or services in any country or jurisdiction by any Dimensional global firm. For informational purposes only. All information is given in good faith and without warranty and should not be considered investment advice or an offer of any security for sale.









 
Find an Advisor

 

 Learn more about our
Mutual Funds

 






Find an Advisor
Financial advisors who work with Dimensional operate independently from Dimensional and vary in the extent to which they use Dimensional Funds.
To find an advisor nearest you,* select one of the options below and enter your zip code.


Find an Advisor




Advisors who primarily use Dimensional funds**



No preference





Enter Zip Code








Submit


* All advisors shown in the search results manage at least $20 million in total assets and have used Dimensional funds for at least one year (based on data known to Dimensional).


** Advisors who primarily use Dimensional funds have over 40% of firm assets invested in Dimensional funds (based on data known to Dimensional).






Shares of Dimensional's funds are generally available only to institutional investors and clients of select independent financial advisors. Such advisors do not receive compensation from Dimensional or its funds. We believe the decision to hire a financial advisor is in fact a highly personal one. Dimensional does not recommend specific advisors. We will provide, free of any charge or obligation, a list of advisors near you who are authorized to use our funds.

Please be advised that Dimensional does not endorse, recommend, or guarantee the services of the independent financial advisors whose contact information we may provide. The financial advisors are not employees or agents of Dimensional. The list will be only a partial list of financial advisors from whom Dimensional currently agrees to accept client investments. By engaging this service, you agree that Dimensional bears no responsibility for the merits and risks of using any of the independent financial advisors listed and does not represent that any adviser is suitable for you.

Dimensional does not evaluate independent financial advisors in any manner. Dimensional does not evaluate the performance or investigate the registration status or disciplinary history of financial advisors. Dimensional does not and will not supervise any financial advisor and takes no responsibility to monitor the financial advisor's performance or transactions in an investor's account. The contact information that you may be provided is for your informational purposes only and you alone bear the sole responsibility of evaluating the merits and risks associated with the use of any independent financial advisor.

Dimensional urges you to carefully evaluate any financial advisor you may consider hiring. For tips on evaluating a financial advisor, visit the investor information website of the US Securities and Exchange Commission, where you may obtain informative publications such as Investment Advisors: What You Need to Know Before Choosing One and Protect Your Money: Check Out Brokers and Investment Advisors.

In exchange for receiving a list of independent financial advisors from whom Dimensional currently agrees to accept client investments into its funds, you agree not to hold Dimensional liable for any possible claim for damages arising from any decision you make to engage the services of a financial advisor.




I Have Read and Agree To The Terms




Find an Advisor
Financial advisors who work with Dimensional operate independently from Dimensional and vary in the extent to which they use Dimensional Funds.
To find an advisor nearest you,* select one of the options below and enter your zip code.


Find an Advisor




Advisors who primarily use Dimensional funds**



No preference





Enter Zip Code








Submit


* All advisors shown in the search results manage at least $20 million in total assets and have used Dimensional funds for at least one year (based on data known to Dimensional).


** Advisors who primarily use Dimensional funds have over 40% of firm assets invested in Dimensional funds (based on data known to Dimensional).




















Financial Advisors | Dimensional













 









 









                    Financial  Advisors
                


Dimensional has a unique way of working with financial advisors. 


We want to build deep, working relationships with advisors who share our desire to pursue better financial outcomes for their clients. We believe that client-focused advice and efficient, value-added access to the capital markets can be a successful combination for both advisors and their clients. 

We have seen many advisors thrive with this approach by reorienting their business around the client experience. These firms focus on offering guidance to help investors think differently about investing, so they may pursue long-term goals without the daily worry.




        ﻿
        











                                The Value of Advice
                            

                                (02:56)
                            

                            For more than 25 years, Dimensional has supported the global movement toward client-focused advice. We believe advisors can play a vital role in helping people pursue their financial and investment goals.
                        









                What helps make a great investor experience?
            


Being well prepared for the range of possible outcomes.
Having an investment philosophy you can stick with.
Tuning out the noise and focusing on what you can control.
Taking a long-term view of investing.







                Supporting Key Elements of Your Practice
            
Dimensional has worked with financial advisors for more than 25 years to help them build differentiated, client-focused businesses. Our service model begins with investments and extends to other key areas of an advisor’s business and messaging needs. 









INVESTMENTS
Gain insights to build solutions




                                                Learn more about modern finance and Dimensional Investing while developing a framework for building globally diversified portfolios that target higher expected returns.
                                            






MESSAGING
Communicate effectively




                                                Leverage Dimensional resources and support to educate clients on key investment principles, manage their expectations, and communicate the value of advice.
                                            






BUSINESS
Manage and grow your business




                                                Tap into Dimensional’s advisor benchmarking studies, training and education, and other business development resources to enhance your practice.
                                            











                Providing a Wide Range of Resources
            
Advisors working with Dimensional enjoy a vibrant community where they can network with other like-minded professionals and participate in educational conferences and workshops. We also offer tools, training, and personalized support to help advisors during their business transition, and we are continually developing new content and programs to support an advisor’s marketing and client communication efforts.
Be a part of the community

Conferences and workshops
Study groups
Virtual podcasts and webinars
Advisor Benchmarks studies
Investor surveys
Dimensional videos
Executive Forums

Establish a tailored roadmap for your firm

Dedicated team of regional directors and client service associates
Insights from Dimensional researchers and academic leaders
Portfolio and performance tools
Staff training
Management retreats
Videos and content for training and education

Aid your marketing  and client communication

Dimensional-authored content
Client-ready materials
Educational videos that can be embedded and shared
Value of Advice series
Find an Advisor program
 










                                        Dave Butler
                                    
Co-Chief Executive Officer and Head of Global Financial Advisor Services                                    
                                

                            “An advisor gives discipline around the process and helps a client stay invested through good markets and bad.” 

                        




                                Dave Butler
                            

                            Co-Chief Executive Officer and Head of Global Financial Advisor Services
                            
                        











Dimensional makes no representation as to the suitability of any advisor, and we do not endorse, recommend, or guarantee the services of any advisor.








*“Dimensional Global Firms” refers to the Dimensional separate but affiliated entities generally, rather than to one particular entity. These entities are Dimensional Fund Advisors LP, Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd., DFA Australia Limited, Dimensional Fund Advisors Canada ULC, Dimensional Fund Advisors Pte. Ltd., and Dimensional Japan Ltd.









 Learn more about our
Next Generation Retirement Solutions

 

 Learn more about our
Mutual Funds

 











Contact Us To learn more, please complete the form below. 



First NameLast NameFirm NameFirm Type
RIA
Independent Broker Dealer
Wirehouse
Bank
Other
EmailPhoneAddressCityStateZip CodeMessageAudienceDC Professional
Financial Advisor
Institutions
Other










 













Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd.  -      Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - John Wood Group Plc - Ordinary shares  - Wood Group































 














What are you looking for today?

Search








Woodgroup website





     This website uses cookies... more


    
    608.50
    
GBX


Twitter 
Linkedin 
Facebook 



Search the site

 Menu


Who We Are




Wood Group designs, modifies, constructs and operates industrial facilities mainly for the oil & gas sector, right across the asset lifecycle.
            
View Wood Group at a glance


About Us
At A GlanceOur ValuesOur HeritageOur LocationsOur LeadersOur Advantage


Business Ethics
Modern Slavery and Human Trafficking statement



Our Locations
Location map






What We Do




Products and Services

Projects & ModificationsOperations & MaintenanceIndustrial ServicesPipeline ServicesDecommissioning ServicesSubseaAutomation & ControlAsset Integrity SolutionsClean EnergyDigital SolutionsStudies





Markets and sectors

Oil & GasIndustrialClean EnergyPower GenerationChemicals & Petrochemicals











Careers






Search Vacancies


Search

More search options








Careers

VacanciesEarly CareersDiversityTraining and DevelopmentOur Recruitment ProcessPlacements and InternshipsFraudulent Recruitment Alert











Investors






Share price

    
    608.50
    
 GBX
 -4.00 (-0.65%)                


EBITA 2016
$363m




Total Revenue 2016
$4,934m


Dividend 2016
33.3c




Profit before tax 2016
$244m


Annual Results 2016
View






Investor centre

Analyst ConsensusAnalyst CoverageCapital Markets DaySign up for AlertsFAQsAnnual General Meeting











Events


Press




25 Jul 2017
Wood Group is supporting the UK’s National Centre for Children’s Books’ exciting new exhibition entitled Comics – explore and create comic art at Seven Stories in Newcastle upon Tyne, showing until June 2018 before touring across the UK.

Press centre

Press Releases and Company News


Papers and PresentationsMedia Centre









Contact













Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd.  -      Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - John Wood Group Plc - Ordinary shares 








Home
InvestorsFinancial InformationFinancial & Regulatory News2017Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd.  -      Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - John Wood Group Plc - Ordinary shares 








FORM 8.3PUBLIC OPENING POSITION DISCLOSURE/DEALING DISCLOSURE BY A PERSON WITH INTERESTS IN RELEVANT SECURITIES REPRESENTING 1% OR MORERule 8.3 of the Takeover Code (the "Code")1.         KEY INFORMATION(a) Full name of discloser: Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. ("Dimensional"), in its capacity as investment manager and on behalf its affiliates who are also investment managers. Dimensional and its affiliates expressly disclaim beneficial ownership of the shares described in this form 8.3(b) Owner or controller of interests and short positions disclosed, if different from 1(a): The naming of nominee or vehicle companies is insufficient.  For a trust, the trustee(s), settlor and beneficiaries must be named.  (c) Name of offeror/offeree in relation to whose relevant securities this form relates: Use a separate form for each offeror/offeree John Wood Group Plc(GB00B5N0P849)(d) If an exempt fund manager connected with an offeror/offeree, state this and specify identity of offeror/offeree:  (e) Date position held/dealing undertaken: For an opening position disclosure, state the latest practicable date prior to the disclosure 21 June 2017(f)  In addition to the company in 1(c) above, is the discloser making disclosures in respect of any other party to the offer? If it is a cash offer or possible cash offer, state "N/A" YESIf YES, specify which: Amec Foster Wheeler Plc(GB0000282623)2.         POSITIONS OF THE PERSON MAKING THE DISCLOSUREIf there are positions or rights to subscribe to disclose in more than one class of relevant securities of the offeror or offeree named in 1(c), copy table 2(a) or (b) (as appropriate) for each additional class of relevant security.(a)        Interests and short positions in the relevant securities of the offeror or offeree to which the disclosure relates following the dealing (if any)Class of relevant security:  4 2/7p Ordinary Shares   Interests Short positions Number % Number %(1) Relevant securities owned and/or controlled: 16,059,962* 4.21    (2) Cash-settled derivatives:         (3) Stock-settled derivatives (including options) and agreements to purchase/sell:          TOTAL: 16,059,962 4.21    *Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. and / or its affiliates do not control voting discretion for 879,923 sharesAll interests and all short positions should be disclosed.Details of any open stock-settled derivative positions (including traded options), or agreements to purchase or sell relevant securities, should be given on a Supplemental Form 8 (Open Positions).(b)        Rights to subscribe for new securities (including directors' and other employee options)Class of relevant security in relation to which subscription right exists:  Details, including nature of the rights concerned and relevant percentages:  3.         DEALINGS (IF ANY) BY THE PERSON MAKING THE DISCLOSUREWhere there have been dealings in more than one class of relevant securities of the offeror or offeree named in 1(c), copy table 3(a), (b), (c) or (d) (as appropriate) for each additional class of relevant security dealt in.The currency of all prices and other monetary amounts should be stated.(a)        Purchases and salesClass of relevant security Purchase/sale  Number of securities Price per unitOrdinary shares Purchase 10,835 GBP 6.5449Ordinary shares Purchase 2,721 GBP 6.5231(b)        Cash-settled derivative transactionsClass of relevant security Product descriptione.g. CFD Nature of dealinge.g. opening/closing a long/short position, increasing/reducing a long/short position Number of reference securities Price per unit         (c)        Stock-settled derivative transactions (including options)(i)         Writing, selling, purchasing or varyingClass of relevant security Product description e.g. call option Writing, purchasing, selling, varying etc. Number of securities to which option relates Exercise price per unit Typee.g. American, European etc. Expiry date Option money paid/ received per unit               (ii)        ExerciseClass of relevant security Product descriptione.g. call option Exercising/ exercised against Number of securities Exercise price per unit         (d)        Other dealings (including subscribing for new securities)Class of relevant security Nature of dealinge.g. subscription, conversion Details Price per unit (if applicable)       4.         OTHER INFORMATION(a)        Indemnity and other dealing arrangementsDetails of any indemnity or option arrangement, or any agreement or understanding, formal or informal, relating to relevant securities which may be an inducement to deal or refrain from dealing entered into by the person making the disclosure and any party to the offer or any person acting in concert with a party to the offer:Irrevocable commitments and letters of intent should not be included.  If there are no such agreements, arrangements or understandings, state "none" (b)        Agreements, arrangements or understandings relating to options or derivativesDetails of any agreement, arrangement or understanding, formal or informal, between the person making the disclosure and any other person relating to:(i)  the voting rights of any relevant securities under any option; or (ii) the voting rights or future acquisition or disposal of any relevant securities to which any derivative is referenced:If there are no such agreements, arrangements or understandings, state "none" (c)        AttachmentsIs a Supplemental Form 8 (Open Positions) attached? NODate of disclosure: 22 June 2017Contact name: Joann KongTelephone number: 020 3033 4876Public disclosures under Rule 8 of the Code must be made to a Regulatory Information Service and must also be emailed to the Takeover Panel at monitoring@disclosure.org.uk.  The Panel's Market Surveillance Unit is available for consultation in relation to the Code's disclosure requirements on +44 (0)20 7638 0129.The Code can be viewed on the Panel's website at www.thetakeoverpanel.org.uk.
























Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - Kennedy-Wilson Holdings Inc - Common stockHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets open in 4 mins.S&P Futures2,465.75-6.25 (-0.25%)Dow Futures21,713.00-30.00 (-0.14%)Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - Kennedy-Wilson Holdings Inc - Common stockGlobeNewswire•July 27, 2017ReblogShareTweetShareFORM 8.3PUBLIC OPENING POSITION DISCLOSURE/DEALING DISCLOSURE BY A PERSON WITH INTERESTS IN RELEVANT SECURITIES REPRESENTING 1% OR MORERule 8.3 of the Takeover Code (the "Code")1.         KEY INFORMATION   (a) Full name of discloser:       Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. ("Dimensional"), in its capacity as investment manager and on behalf its affiliates who are also investment managers. Dimensional and its affiliates expressly disclaim beneficial ownership of the shares described in this form 8.3     (b) Owner or controller of interests and short positions disclosed, if different from 1(a):     The naming of nominee or vehicle companies is insufficient.  For a trust, the trustee(s), settlor and beneficiaries must be named.             (c) Name of offeror/offeree in relation to whose relevant securities this form relates:     Use a separate form for each offeror/offeree       Kennedy-Wilson Holdings Inc(US4893981070)     (d) If an exempt fund manager connected with an offeror/offeree, state this and specify identity of offeror/offeree:             (e) Date position held/dealing undertaken:     For an opening position disclosure, state the latest practicable date prior to the disclosure       26 July 2017     (f)  In addition to the company in 1(c) above, is the discloser making disclosures in respect of any other party to the offer?     If it is a cash offer or possible cash offer, state "N/A"       NOIf YES, specify which:   2.         POSITIONS OF THE PERSON MAKING THE DISCLOSUREIf there are positions or rights to subscribe to disclose in more than one class of relevant securities of the offeror or offeree named in 1(c), copy table 2(a) or (b) (as appropriate) for each additional class of relevant security.(a)        Interests and short positions in the relevant securities of the offeror or offeree to which the disclosure relates following the dealing (if any)   Class of relevant security:         USD 0.0001 Common               Interests       Short positions         Number       %       Number       %     (1) Relevant securities owned and/or controlled:       2,479,360*       2.17                     (2) Cash-settled derivatives:                                       (3) Stock-settled derivatives (including options) and agreements to purchase/sell:                                                                                                                                  TOTAL:       2,479,360       2.17                   *Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. and / or its affiliates do not control voting discretion for 108,837 shares.All interests and all short positions should be disclosed.Details of any open stock-settled derivative positions (including traded options), or agreements to purchase or sell relevant securities, should be given on a Supplemental Form 8 (Open Positions).(b)        Rights to subscribe for new securities (including directors` and other employee options)   Class of relevant security in relation to which subscription right exists:             Details, including nature of the rights concerned and relevant percentages:           3.         DEALINGS (IF ANY) BY THE PERSON MAKING THE DISCLOSUREWhere there have been dealings in more than one class of relevant securities of the offeror or offeree named in 1(c), copy table 3(a), (b), (c) or (d) (as appropriate) for each additional class of relevant security dealt in.The currency of all prices and other monetary amounts should be stated.(a)        Purchases and sales   Class of relevant security       Purchase/sale         Number of securities       Price per unit     Common       Purchase       6,383       USD 20.5078     Common       Purchase       523       USD 20.5151   (b)        Cash-settled derivative transactions   Class of relevant security       Product descriptione.g. CFD       Nature of dealinge.g. opening/closing a long/short position, increasing/reducing a long/short position       Number of reference securities       Price per unit                                         (c)        Stock-settled derivative transactions (including options)(i)         Writing, selling, purchasing or varying   Class of relevant security       Product description e.g. call option       Writing, purchasing, selling, varying etc.       Number of securities to which option relates       Exercise price per unit       Typee.g. American, European etc.       Expiry date       Option money paid/ received per unit                                                                 (ii)        Exercise   Class of relevant security       Product descriptione.g. call option       Exercising/ exercised against       Number of securities       Exercise price per unit                                         (d)        Other dealings (including subscribing for new securities)   Class of relevant security       Nature of dealinge.g. subscription, conversion       Details       Price per unit (if applicable)                                 4.         OTHER INFORMATION(a)        Indemnity and other dealing arrangements   Details of any indemnity or option arrangement, or any agreement or understanding, formal or informal, relating to relevant securities which may be an inducement to deal or refrain from dealing entered into by the person making the disclosure and any party to the offer or any person acting in concert with a party to the offer:Irrevocable commitments and letters of intent should not be included.  If there are no such agreements, arrangements or understandings, state "none"             (b)        Agreements, arrangements or understandings relating to options or derivatives   Details of any agreement, arrangement or understanding, formal or informal, between the person making the disclosure and any other person relating to:(i)  the voting rights of any relevant securities under any option; or (ii) the voting rights or future acquisition or disposal of any relevant securities to which any derivative is referenced:If there are no such agreements, arrangements or understandings, state "none"             (c)        Attachments   Is a Supplemental Form 8 (Open Positions) attached?       NO      Date of disclosure:       27 July 2017     Contact name:       Joann Kong     Telephone number:       020 3033 4876   Public disclosures under Rule 8 of the Code must be made to a Regulatory Information Service and must also be emailed to the Takeover Panel at monitoring@disclosure.org.uk.  The Panel`s Market Surveillance Unit is available for consultation in relation to the Code`s disclosure requirements on +44 (0)20 7638 0129.The Code can be viewed on the Panel`s website at www.thetakeoverpanel.org.uk.This announcement is distributed by NASDAQ OMX Corporate Solutions on behalf of NASDAQ OMX Corporate Solutions clients.The issuer of this announcement warrants that they are solely responsible for the content, accuracy and originality of the information contained therein.Source: Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. via GlobeNewswireHUG#2123611ReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextConsumers, businesses lift U.S. economic growth in second quarterReutersEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredTrump’s unwitting legacy could be universal health coverageYahoo FinanceSean Hannity responds to claim he ran up a $42,000 tab at Trump's hotel after flying in a 70-year-old lobster from MaineBusiness InsiderGoogle is quietly buying properties worth $820 million in Silicon Valley as it looks to keep growingCNBCZuckerberg Wife's Ambitious Secret Finally ExposedUNewz.MeSponsoredTwitter is only famous now because of President Trump: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoGDP — What you need to know in markets on FridayYahoo FinanceRepublicans warn Trump: No confirmation hearing for a Sessions replacement, and no recess appointment eitherBusiness InsiderThis Will Be In Everyone's Household By 2020Banyan HillSponsoredExxon profit nearly doubles, but falls short of expectationsReutersStarbucks CEO: The Amazon-Whole Foods deal shows where retail is goingYahoo FinanceVirgin Atlantic founder Sir Richard Branson sells 31pc stake in airline for £220m as part of new tie-up with Air France-KLMThe TelegraphA Penny-Crypto Miracle Making Some Americans RichAgora FinancialSponsoredAmazon could be the first trillion dollar company: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoRolls-Royce Motor CEO: We’re not in the auto business. We’re in the luxury business.Yahoo FinanceRussia orders cut in US diplomats in reaction to sanctionsDirk: Gosh, I hope this doesn't lead Russia to deny America of all the Russian cars, Russian electronics, Russian textiles and all other Russian products that we consume.

Oh wait...we don't. They're irrelevant.Join the Conversation1 / 5671








Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - Elis SA - Ordinary sharesHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets open in 4 mins.S&P Futures2,465.75-6.25 (-0.25%)Dow Futures21,713.00-30.00 (-0.14%)Nasdaq Futures5,875.50-34.00 (-0.58%)Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. : Form 8.3 - Elis SA - Ordinary sharesGlobeNewswire•July 21, 2017ReblogShareTweetShareFORM 8.3PUBLIC OPENING POSITION DISCLOSURE/DEALING DISCLOSURE BY A PERSON WITH INTERESTS IN RELEVANT SECURITIES REPRESENTING 1% OR MORERule 8.3 of the Takeover Code (the "Code")1.         KEY INFORMATION   (a) Full name of discloser:       Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. ("Dimensional"), in its capacity as investment manager and on behalf its affiliates who are also investment managers. Dimensional and its affiliates expressly disclaim beneficial ownership of the shares described in this form 8.3     (b) Owner or controller of interests and short positions disclosed, if different from 1(a):     The naming of nominee or vehicle companies is insufficient.  For a trust, the trustee(s), settlor and beneficiaries must be named.             (c) Name of offeror/offeree in relation to whose relevant securities this form relates:     Use a separate form for each offeror/offeree       Elis SA(FR0012435121)     (d) If an exempt fund manager connected with an offeror/offeree, state this and specify identity of offeror/offeree:             (e) Date position held/dealing undertaken:     For an opening position disclosure, state the latest practicable date prior to the disclosure       20 July 2017     (f)  In addition to the company in 1(c) above, is the discloser making disclosures in respect of any other party to the offer?     If it is a cash offer or possible cash offer, state "N/A"       YESIf YES, specify which:                    Berendsen Plc(GB00B0F99717)   2.         POSITIONS OF THE PERSON MAKING THE DISCLOSUREIf there are positions or rights to subscribe to disclose in more than one class of relevant securities of the offeror or offeree named in 1(c), copy table 2(a) or (b) (as appropriate) for each additional class of relevant security.(a)        Interests and short positions in the relevant securities of the offeror or offeree to which the disclosure relates following the dealing (if any)   Class of relevant security:         EUR 10.00 Ordinary Shares               Interests       Short positions         Number       %       Number       %     (1) Relevant securities owned and/or controlled:       744,588*       0.53                     (2) Cash-settled derivatives:                                       (3) Stock-settled derivatives (including options) and agreements to purchase/sell:                                                                                                                                                  TOTAL:       744,588       0.53                   *Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. and / or its affiliates do not control voting discretion for 17,372 shares.All interests and all short positions should be disclosed.Details of any open stock-settled derivative positions (including traded options), or agreements to purchase or sell relevant securities, should be given on a Supplemental Form 8 (Open Positions).(b)        Rights to subscribe for new securities (including directors` and other employee options)   Class of relevant security in relation to which subscription right exists:             Details, including nature of the rights concerned and relevant percentages:           3.         DEALINGS (IF ANY) BY THE PERSON MAKING THE DISCLOSUREWhere there have been dealings in more than one class of relevant securities of the offeror or offeree named in 1(c), copy table 3(a), (b), (c) or (d) (as appropriate) for each additional class of relevant security dealt in.The currency of all prices and other monetary amounts should be stated.(a)        Purchases and sales   Class of relevant security       Purchase/sale         Number of securities       Price per unit     Ordinary shares       Purchase       2,264       EUR 20.6773   (b)        Cash-settled derivative transactions   Class of relevant security       Product descriptione.g. CFD       Nature of dealinge.g. opening/closing a long/short position, increasing/reducing a long/short position       Number of reference securities       Price per unit                                         (c)        Stock-settled derivative transactions (including options)(i)         Writing, selling, purchasing or varying   Class of relevant security       Product description e.g. call option       Writing, purchasing, selling, varying etc.       Number of securities to which option relates       Exercise price per unit       Typee.g. American, European etc.       Expiry date       Option money paid/ received per unit                                                                 (ii)        Exercise   Class of relevant security       Product descriptione.g. call option       Exercising/ exercised against       Number of securities       Exercise price per unit                                         (d)        Other dealings (including subscribing for new securities)   Class of relevant security       Nature of dealinge.g. subscription, conversion       Details       Price per unit (if applicable)                                 4.         OTHER INFORMATION(a)        Indemnity and other dealing arrangements   Details of any indemnity or option arrangement, or any agreement or understanding, formal or informal, relating to relevant securities which may be an inducement to deal or refrain from dealing entered into by the person making the disclosure and any party to the offer or any person acting in concert with a party to the offer:Irrevocable commitments and letters of intent should not be included.  If there are no such agreements, arrangements or understandings, state "none"             (b)        Agreements, arrangements or understandings relating to options or derivatives   Details of any agreement, arrangement or understanding, formal or informal, between the person making the disclosure and any other person relating to:(i)  the voting rights of any relevant securities under any option; or (ii) the voting rights or future acquisition or disposal of any relevant securities to which any derivative is referenced:If there are no such agreements, arrangements or understandings, state "none"             (c)        Attachments   Is a Supplemental Form 8 (Open Positions) attached?       NO      Date of disclosure:       21 July 2017     Contact name:       Joann Kong     Telephone number:       020 3033 4876   Public disclosures under Rule 8 of the Code must be made to a Regulatory Information Service and must also be emailed to the Takeover Panel at monitoring@disclosure.org.uk.  The Panel`s Market Surveillance Unit is available for consultation in relation to the Code`s disclosure requirements on +44 (0)20 7638 0129.The Code can be viewed on the Panel`s website at www.thetakeoverpanel.org.uk.This announcement is distributed by NASDAQ OMX Corporate Solutions on behalf of NASDAQ OMX Corporate Solutions clients.The issuer of this announcement warrants that they are solely responsible for the content, accuracy and originality of the information contained therein.Source: Dimensional Fund Advisors Ltd. via GlobeNewswireHUG#2122225ReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextConsumers, businesses lift U.S. economic growth in second quarterReutersEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredTrump’s unwitting legacy could be universal health coverageYahoo FinanceSean Hannity responds to claim he ran up a $42,000 tab at Trump's hotel after flying in a 70-year-old lobster from MaineBusiness InsiderGoogle is quietly buying properties worth $820 million in Silicon Valley as it looks to keep growingCNBCZuckerberg Wife's Ambitious Secret Finally ExposedUNewz.MeSponsoredTwitter is only famous now because of President Trump: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoGDP — What you need to know in markets on FridayYahoo FinanceRepublicans warn Trump: No confirmation hearing for a Sessions replacement, and no recess appointment eitherBusiness InsiderThis Will Be In Everyone's Household By 2020Banyan HillSponsoredExxon profit nearly doubles, but falls short of expectationsReutersStarbucks CEO: The Amazon-Whole Foods deal shows where retail is goingYahoo FinanceVirgin Atlantic founder Sir Richard Branson sells 31pc stake in airline for £220m as part of new tie-up with Air France-KLMThe TelegraphA Penny-Crypto Miracle Making Some Americans RichAgora FinancialSponsoredAmazon could be the first trillion dollar company: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoRolls-Royce Motor CEO: We’re not in the auto business. We’re in the luxury business.Yahoo FinanceRussia orders cut in US diplomats in reaction to sanctionsDirk: Gosh, I hope this doesn't lead Russia to deny America of all the Russian cars, Russian electronics, Russian textiles and all other Russian products that we consume.

Oh wait...we don't. They're irrelevant.Join the Conversation1 / 5672








